Ea
Ey.Ea.Ee.

 May either come from ıᵹ, an island, by melting the Saxon ᵹ into ẏ, which is usually done; or from the Saxon a, which signifies a water, river, &c. or, lastly, from ıaᵹ, a field, by the same kind of melting. Gibson.

Each
Each. pron. [elc, Saxon; elch, Dutch; ilk, Scottish.]

 Either of two.
Though your orbs of diff'rent greatness be,Yet both are for each other's use dispos'd;His to inclose, and your's to be inclos'd. Dryden.
 Every one of any number. This sense is rare, except in poetry.
Th' invention all admir'd, and each how heTo be th' inventer miss'd. Milton, b. vi.
                                      Let eachHis adamantine coat gird well, and eachFit well his helm. Milton, b. vi.
By hunger, that each other creature tames,Thou art not to be harm'd, therefore not mov'd;Thy temperance invincible besides. Milton's Paradise Reg.
Wise Plato said, the world with men was stor'd,That succour each to other might afford. Denham.

To Each the correspondent word is other, whether it be used of two, or of a greater number.
'Tis said they eat each other. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
Let each esteem other better than themselves. Phil. ii. 3.
Loveliest of women! heaven is in thy soul;Beauty and virtue shine for ever round thee,Bright'ning each other! Thou art all divine! Addis. Cato.

Ead
Ead. [œd, ed.] in the compound, and eading in the simple names, denotes happiness, or blessedness.  Thus Eadward is a happy preserver; Eadulph, happy assistance; Eadgar, happy power; Eadwin, happy conqueror; which Macarius Eupolemus, Fausta, Fortunatus, Felicianus, &c. do in some measure resemble.  Ead may also in some cases be derived from the Saxon eath, which signifies easy, gentle, mild. Gib. Camden.

Eager
Eáger. adj. [eaʒor, Saxon; aigre, French.]

 Struck with desire; ardently wishing; keenly desirous; vehement in desire; hotly longing.
Of action eager, and intent of thought,The chiefs your honourable danger sought. Dryden's Ovid.
Eager to read the rest, Achates came. Dryden's Æn.
With joy th' ambitious youth his mother heard,And eager for the journey soon prepar'd;He longs the world beneath him to survey,To guide the chariot, and to give the day. Dryden.
Love inflam'd, and eager on his bliss,Smother'd her words. Addison's Ovid's Metam. b. ii.
 It is used sometimes with of, sometimes with on or after before the thing sought.

 Hot of disposition; vehement; ardent; impetuous.
Apt as well to quicken the spirits as to allay that which is too eager. Hooker, b. v. s. 38.
Nor do the eager clamours of disputants yield more relief to eclipsed truth, than did the sounding brass of old to the labouring moon. Glanv. Sceps. c. 19.
This is not a general character of women, but a reproof of some eager spirited gipsies. L'Estrange.
Imperfect zeal is hot and eager, without knowledge. Spratt.
                              Palemon replies,Eager his tone, and ardent were his eyes. Dryden.
A man, charged with a crime of which he thinks himself innocent, is apt to be too eager in his own defence. Dryden.
 Quick; busy; easily put in action.
                      His Numidian geniusIs well dispos'd to mischief, were he promptAnd eager on it; but he must be spurr'd. Addison's Cato.
 Sharp; sower; acid.
          With a sudden vigour it doth possetAnd curd, like eager droppings into milk,The thin and wholsome blood. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
 Keen; severe; biting.
The air bites shrewdly; it is very cold.— It is a nipping and an eager air. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
The resistance of bone to cold is greater than of flesh; for that the flesh shrinketh, but the bone resisteth, whereby the cold becometh more eager. Bacon's Natural History, № 688.
 Brittle; inflexible; not ductile. A cant word of artificers.
Gold will be sometimes so eager, as artists call it, that it will as little endure the hammer as glass itself. Locke.

Eagerly
Eágerly. adv. [from eager.]

 With great ardour of desire; with impetuosity of inclination.
To the holy war how fast and eagerly did men go, when the priest persuaded them that whosoever died in that expedition was a martyr? South's Sermons.
How eagerly he flew, when Europe's fateDid for the seed of future actions wait. Stepney.
 Ardently; hotly.
                Brutus gave the word too early,Who having some advantage on Octavius,Took it too eagerly; his soldiers fell to spoil,Whilst we by Anthony were all inclos'd. Shak. Jul. Cæsar.
 Keenly; sharply.
Abundance of rain froze so eagerly as it fell, that it seemed the depth of Winter had of a sudden been come in. Knolles.

Eagerness
Eágerness. n.s. [from eager.]

 Keenness of desire; ardour of inclination.
She knew her distance, and did angle for me,Madding my eagerness with her restraint. Shakespeare.
Have you not seen, when whistled from the fist,Some falcon stoop'd at what her eye design'd,And, with her eagerness, the quarry miss'd. Dryden.
The eagerness and strong bent of the mind after knowledge, if not warily regulated, is often an hindrance to it. Locke.
Detraction and obloquy are received with as much eagerness as wit and humour. Addison's Freeholder.
                Juba lives to catchThat dear embrace, and to return it too,With mutual warmth and eagerness of love. Addison's Cato.
His continued application to publick affairs diverts him from those pleasures, which are pursued with eagerness by princes who have not the publick so much at heart. Addison.
The things of this world, with whatever eagerness they engage our pursuit, leave us still empty and unsatisfied with their fruition. Rogers's Sermons.
 Impetuosity; vehemence; violence.
It finds them in the eagerness and height of their devotion; they are speechless for the time that it continues, and prostrate and dead when it departs. Dryden.
I'll kill thee with such eagerness of haste,As fiends, let loose, would lay all nature waste. Dryd. Aur.

Eagle
Eágle. n.s. [aigle, French; aquila, Latin; ealler, Erse.]

 A bird of prey, which, as it is reported, renews its age when it grows old.  But some think that this recovery of youth happens no otherwise in the eagle than in other birds, by casting their feathers every year in the moulting season, and having others in their room.  It is also said not to drink at all, like other birds with sharp claws.  It is given out, that when an eagle sees its young so well grown as to venture upon flying, it hovers over their nest, flutters with its wings, and excites them to imitate it, and take their flight; and when it sees them weary, or fearful, it takes and carries them upon its back.  Eagles are said to be extremely sharp-sighted, and, when they take flight, spring perpendicularly upward, with their eyes steadily fixed upon the sun, mounting 'till, by their distance, they disappear. Calmet.
                          Dismay'd not thisOur captains Macbeth and Banquo?— — Yes,As sparrows eagles, or the hare the lion. Shakesp. Macbeth.
Draw forth the monsters of th' abyss profound,Or fetch th' aerial eagle to the ground. Pope's Ess. on Man.
 The standard of the ancient Romans.
Arts still follow'd where Rome's eagles flew. Pope.

Eagle-eyed
Eagle-eyed. adj. [from eagle and eye.]

 Sharp-sighted as an eagle.
As he was rarely quick and perspicacious, so was he inwardly eagle-eyed, and perfectly versed in the humours of his subjects. Howel's Vocal Forrest.
        Ev'ry one is eagle-ey'd to seeAnother's faults and his deformity. Dryden's Pers. Sat. 4.

Easter
Eáster. n.s. [eastre, Saxon; ooster, Dutch.] The day on which the Christian church commemorates our Saviour's resurrection.
Did'st thou not fall out with a taylor for wearing his new doublet before Easter? Shakespeare's Romeo and Juliet.
Victor's unbrother-like heat towards the Eastern churches, in the controversy about Easter, fomented that difference into a schism. Decay of Piety.

Ee
Ey.Ea.Ee.

 May either come from ıᵹ, an island, by melting the Saxon ᵹ into ẏ, which is usually done; or from the Saxon a, which signifies a water, river, &c. or, lastly, from ıaᵹ, a field, by the same kind of melting. Gibson.

Egotism
Égotism. n.s. [from ego, Latin.] The fault committed in writing by the frequent repetition of the word ego, or I; too frequent mention of a man's self, in writing or conversation.
 The most violent egotism which I have met with, in the course of my reading, is that of cardinal Wolsey's; ego & rex meus, I and my king. Spectator, № 562.

Egotist
Égotist. n.s. [from ego.] One that is always repeating the word ego, I; a talker of himself.
 A tribe of egotists, for whom I have always had a mortal aversion, are the authors of memoirs, who are never mentioned in any works but their own. Spectator, № 562.

Egotize
To Égotize. v.n. [from ego.] To talk much of one's self.

Ejulation
Ejulátion. n.s. [ejulatio, Latin.] Outcry; lamentation; moan; wailing.
Instead of hymns and praises, he breaks out into ejulations and effeminate wailings Government of the Tongue.
                    With dismal groansAnd ejulation, in the pangs of death,Some call for aid neglected; some, o'erturn'dIn the fierce shock, lie gasping. Phillips.

Elastical
Ela'stical.Ela'stick.

adj. [from ἐλάω.] Having the power of returning to the form from which it is distorted or withheld; springy; having the power of a spring.


By what elastick engines did she rear The starry roof, and roll the orbs in air. Blackm. Creation.
If the body is compact, and bends or yields inward to pression, without any sliding of its parts, it is hard and elastick, returning to its figure with a force rising from the mutual attraction of its parts. Newton's Opt.
The most common diversities of human constitutions arise from the solids, as to their different degrees of strength and tension; in some being too lax and weak, in others too elastick and strong. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
A fermentation must be excited in some assignable place, which may expand itself by its elastical power, and break through, where it meets with the weakest resistance. Bentley.

Elasticity
Elastic'ity. n.s. [elastick.] Force in bodies, by which they endeavour to restore themselves to the posture from whence they were displaced by any external force. Quincy.
A lute string will bear a hundred weight without rupture; but, at the same time, cannot exert its elasticity: take away fifty, and immediately it raiseth the weight. Arbuth. on Alim.
Me emptiness and dulness could inspire, And were my elasticity and fire. Pope's Dunciad, b. i.

Elastick
Ela'stical.Ela'stick.

adj. [from ἐλάω.] Having the power of returning to the form from which it is distorted or withheld; springy; having the power of a spring.


By what elastick engines did she rear The starry roof, and roll the orbs in air. Blackm. Creation.
If the body is compact, and bends or yields inward to pression, without any sliding of its parts, it is hard and elastick, returning to its figure with a force rising from the mutual attraction of its parts. Newton's Opt.
The most common diversities of human constitutions arise from the solids, as to their different degrees of strength and tension; in some being too lax and weak, in others too elastick and strong. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
A fermentation must be excited in some assignable place, which may expand itself by its elastical power, and break through, where it meets with the weakest resistance. Bentley.

Elate (adjective)
Ela'te. adj. [elatus, Latin.] Flushed with success; elevated prosperity; lofty; haughty.
Oh, thoughtless mortals! ever blind to fate! Too soon dejected, and too soon elate! Pope's Ra. Of Lock.
         I, of mind elate, and scorning fear Thus with new taunts insult the monster's ear. Pope's Odyss.

Elate (verb)
El'ate. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To elevate with success; to puff up with prosperity.

 To exult; to heighten. An unusual sense.
Or truth, divinely breaking on his mind,Elates his being, and unfolds his power. Thompson's Autumn

Elaterium
Elatérium. n.s. [Latin.] An inspissated juice, in fragments of flat and thin cakes, seldom thicker than a shilling. It is light, of a friable texture; pale, dead, whitish colour, and an acrid and pungent taste. It is procured from the fruit of the wild cucumber; the seeds of which swim in a large quantity of an acrid and almost caustick liquor. It is a very violent and rough purge. Hill.

Elation
Elátion. n.s. [from elate.] Haughtiness proceeding from success; pride of prosperity.
 God began to punish this vail elation of mind, by withdrawing his favours. Atterbury's Sermons.

Elbow (noun)
E'lbow. n.s. [lboᵹa, Saxon.]

 The next joint or curvature of the arm below the shoulder.
 In some fair evening, on your elbow laid, You dream of triumphs in the rural shade. Pope.
 Any flexure, or angle.
  Fruit-trees, or vines, set upon a wall between elbows or buttresses of stone, ripen more than upon a plain wall. Bacon.
 To be at the Elbow. To be near; to be at hand.
 Here stand behind this bulk. Straight will he come: Wear thy good rapier bare, and put it home: Quick, quick; fear nothing, I'll be at thy elbow. Shak. Othel.

Elbow (verb active)
E'lbow. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To push with the elbow.
One elbows him; one justles in the shole. Dryden's Juven.
 To push; to drive to distance; to encroach upon.
                 It thrusts and stretches out,And elbows all the kingdoms round about. Dryden.
If fortune takes not off this boy betimes, He'll make mad work, and elbow all his neighbours. Dryden.

Elbow (verb neuter)
To Élbow. v.n. To jut out in angles. Dict.

Elbowchair
Elbowcha'ir. n.s. [elbow and chair.] A chair with arms to support the elbows.
Swans and elbowchairs, in the opera of Dioclesian, have danced upon the English stage with good success. Gay.

Elbowroom
E'lbowroom. n.s. [elbow and room.] Room to stretch out the elbows on each side; perfect freedom from confinement.
                 Now my soul hath elbowroom; It would not out at windows nor at doors. Shakespeare.
The natives are not so many, but that there may be elbowroom enough for them, and for the adventives also. Bacon.
A politician must put himself into a state of liberty, so to provide elbowroom for his conscience to have its full play in. South's Sermons.

Eld
Eld. n.s. [alꝺ, Saxon; eld, Scottish.]

 Old age; decrepitude.
 Her heart with joy unwonted inly swel'd, As feeling wond'rous comfort in her weaker eld. Fa. Queen.
 Old people; persons worn out with years.
                          Thy blazed youth Becomes assuaged, and doth beg the alms Of palsied eld. Shakespeare's Measure for Measure.
 He thought it touch'd his deity full near, If likewise he some fair one wedded not, Thereby to wipe away th' infamous blot Of long uncoupled bed and childless eld. Milton.

Elder (adjective)
E'lder. adj. The comparative of eld, now corrupted to old. alꝺ, alꝺoꞃ, Saxon.] Surpassing another in years; survivor; having the privileges of primogeniture.
They bring the comparison of younger daughters comforming themselves in attire to the example of their elder sisters. Hooker, b. iv. s. 13.
               Let still the woman take An elder than herself; so wears she to him So sways the level in her husband's heart. Sh. Twelfth Night.
How I firmly am resolv'd, you know; That is, not to bestow my youngest daughter, Before I have a husband for the elder. Sh. Tam. of the Shrew.
The elder of his children comes to acquire a degree of authority among the younger, by the same means the father did among them. Temple.
                     Fame's high temple stands; Stupendous pile! Not rear'd by mortal hands! Whate'er proud Rome, or artful Greece beheld,Or elder Babylon, its frame excell'd. Pope's Temp. of Fame.

Elder (noun)
E'lder. n.s. [llaꞃa, Saxon.] The name of a tree.
The branches are full of pith, having but little wood: the flowers are monopetalous, divided into several segments, and expand in form of a rose: these are, for the most part, collected into an umbel, and are succeeded by soft succulent berries, having three seeds in each. It may be easily propagated from cuttings or seeds; but the former, being the most expeditious method, is generally practiced. The season for planting their cuttings is any time from September to March, thrusting them six or eight inches into the ground. Dwarf elder is near London propagated for medicinal use.  Miller.
                         Look for thy reward Amongst the nettles at the elder tree, Which overshades the mouth of that same pit. Sh. Tit. And.
Then seek the bank where flowering elders crowd. Thom.

Elderly
E'lderly. adj. [from elder.] No longer young; bordering upon old age
I have a race of orderly elderly people of both sexes at command, who can bawl when I am deaf, and tread softly when I am giddy. Swift to Pope.

Elders
E'lders. n.s. [from elder.]

 Persons whose age gives them a claim to credit and reverence.
 Rebuke not an elder, but intreat him as a father, and the younger men as brethren. 1 Tim. v. 1.
                              Our elders say, The barren, touched in this holy chase, Shake off their steril curse. Shakespeare's Julius Cæsar.
 Among the Lacedæmonians, the chief magistrates, as they were, so they are called, elder men. Raleigh's H. of the World.
 The blushing youth their virtuous awe disclose, And from their seats the reverend elders rose. Sandys.
 Ancestors.
 Says the goose, if it will be no better, e'en carry your head as your elders have done before ye. L'Estrange.
          I lose my patience, and I own it too, Where works are censur'd, not as bad, but new; While, if our elders break all reason's laws, Those fools demand not pardon, but applause. Pope.
 Those who are older than others.
 At the board, and in private, it very well becometh children's innocency to pray, and their elders to say amen. Hooker.
 [Among the Jews.] Rulers of the people.

 [In the New Testament.] Ecclesiasticks.

 [Among presbyterians.] Laymen introduced into the kirk-polity in sessions, presbyteries, synods and assemblies.
              Flea-bitten synod, an assembly brew'd Of clerks and elders ana; like the rude Chaos of presbytry, where laymen ride With the tame woolpack clergy by their side. Cleaveland.

Eldership
E'ldership. n.s. [from elder.]

 Seniority; primogeniture.
 That all should Alibech adore, 'tis true; But some respect is to my birthright due: My claim to her by eldership I prove. Dryden's Ind. Emp.
                      Nor were the eldership Of Artaxerxes worth our least of fears, If Memnon's interest did not prop his cause. Rowe.
 Presbytery; ecclesiastical senate; kirk-session.
 Here were the seeds sown of that controversy which sprang up between Beza and Erastus, about the matter of excommunications; whether there ought to be in all churches an eldership, having power to excommunicate, and a part of that eldership to be of necessity certain chosen out from amongst the laity for that purpose. Hooker, Preface.

Eldest
E'ldest. adj. The superlative of eld, now changed to old. [alꝺ, alꝺoꞃ, alꝺꞅꞇ, Saxon.]

 The oldest; the child that has the right of primogeniture.
                  We will establish our estate upon Our eldest Malcolm, whom we name hereafter The prince of Cumberland. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 The mother's and her eldest daughter's grace, It seems, had brib'd him to prolong their space. Dryden.
 The person that has lived most years.
 Eldest parents signifies either the oldest men and women that have had children, or those who have longest had issue. Locke.

Electre
Eléctre. n.s. [electrum, Latin.]

 Amber; which, having the quality when warmed by friction of attracting bodies, gave to one species of attraction the name of electricity, and to the bodies that so attract the epithet electrick.

 A mixed metal.
Change silver plate or vessel into the compound stuff, being a kind of silver electre, and turn the rest into coin. Bacon.

Electrical
Eléctrical.Eléctrick.

adj. [from electrum. See Electre.]



 Attractive without magnetism; attractive by a peculiar property, supposed once to belong chiefly to amber.
By electrick bodies do I conceive not such only as take up light bodies, in which number the ancients only placed jett and amber; but such as, conveniently placed, attract all bodies palpable. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 4.
An electrick body can by friction emit an exhalation so subtile, and yet so potent, as by its emission to cause no sensible diminution of the weight of the electrick body, and to be expanded through a sphere, whose diameter is above two feet, and yet to be able to carry up lead, copper, or leaf-gold, at the distance of above a foot from the electrick body. Newton.
 Produced by an electrick body.
If that attraction were not rather electrical than magnetical, it was wonderous what Helmont delivereth concerning a glass, wherein the magistery of loadstone was prepared, which retained an attractive quality. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
If a piece of white paper, or a white cloath, or the end of one's finger, be held at about a quarter of an inch from the glass, the electrick vapour, excited by friction, will, by dashing against the white paper, cloth, or finger, be put into such an agitation as to emit light. Newton's Opt.

Electricity
Electrícity. n.s. [from electrick. See Electre.] A property in some bodies, whereby, when rubbed so as to grow warm, they draw little bits of paper, or such like substances, to them. Quincy.
Such was the account given a few years ago of electricity; but the industry of the present age, first excited by the experiments of Gray, has discovered in electricity a multitude of philosophical wonders.  Bodies electrified by a sphere of glass, turned nimbly round, not only emit flame, but may be fitted with such a quantity of the electrical vapour, as, if discharged at once upon a human body, would endanger life.  The force of this vapour has hitherto appeared instantaneous, persons at both ends of a long chain seeming to be struck at once.  The philosophers are now endeavouring to intercept the strokes of lightning.

Electrick
Eléctrical.Eléctrick.

adj. [from electrum. See Electre.]



 Attractive without magnetism; attractive by a peculiar property, supposed once to belong chiefly to amber.
By electrick bodies do I conceive not such only as take up light bodies, in which number the ancients only placed jett and amber; but such as, conveniently placed, attract all bodies palpable. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 4.
An electrick body can by friction emit an exhalation so subtile, and yet so potent, as by its emission to cause no sensible diminution of the weight of the electrick body, and to be expanded through a sphere, whose diameter is above two feet, and yet to be able to carry up lead, copper, or leaf-gold, at the distance of above a foot from the electrick body. Newton.
 Produced by an electrick body.
If that attraction were not rather electrical than magnetical, it was wonderous what Helmont delivereth concerning a glass, wherein the magistery of loadstone was prepared, which retained an attractive quality. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
If a piece of white paper, or a white cloath, or the end of one's finger, be held at about a quarter of an inch from the glass, the electrick vapour, excited by friction, will, by dashing against the white paper, cloth, or finger, be put into such an agitation as to emit light. Newton's Opt.

Eleemosynary
Eleemósynary. adj. [ἐλεημοσύνη.]

 Living upon alms; depending upon charity.
 It is little better than an absurdity, that the cause should be an eleemosynary for its subsistence to its effects, as a nature posteriour to and and dependent on itself. Glanv. Sceps. c. 18.
 Given in charity.

Elegant
Elégant. adj. [elegans, Latin.]

 Pleasing with minuter beauties.
 Trifles themselves are elegant in him. Pope.
 There may'st thou find some elegant retreat. London.
 Nice; not coarse; not gross.
 Polite with candour, elegant with ease. Pope.

Elegantly
Élegantly. adv. [from elegant.]

 In such a manner as to please without elevation.

 Neatly; nicely; with minute beauty.
 Whoever would write elegantly, must have regard to the different turn and juncture of every period: there must be proper distances and pauses. Pope's Odyssey, Notes.

Elegiack
Elegíack. adj. [elegiacus, Latin.]

 Used in elegies.

 Pertaining to elegies.

 Mournful; sorrowful.
 Let elegiack lay the woe relate, Soft as the breath of distant flutes. Gay's Trivia.

Elegy
E'legy. n.s. [elegus, Latin.]

 A mournful song.
 He hangs odes upon hawthorns, and elegies upon brambles, all forsooth deifying the name of Rosalind. Shak. As you like it.
 A funeral song.
 So on meanders banks, when death is nigh, The mournful swan sings her own elegy. Dryden.
 A short poem without points or turns.

Element (noun)
Élement. n.s.elementum, Latin.]

 The first or constituent principle of any thing.
 If nature should intermit her course, those principal and mother elements of the world, whereof all things in this lower world are made, should lose the qualities which now they have. Hooker, b. i. s. 3.
 A man may rationally retain doubts concerning the number of those ingredients of bodies, which some call elements, and other principles. Boyle's Phys. Consider.
 Simple substances are either spirits, which have no manner of composition, or the first principles of bodies, usually called elements, of which other bodies are compounded. Watts.
 The four elements, usually so called, are earth, fire, air, water, of which our world is composed.
 The king is but a man: the violet smells to him as it doth to me; and the element shews to him as it doth to me. Shakes.
         My dearest sister, fare thee well; The elements be kind to thee, and make Thy spirits all of comfort. Shakes. Anth. and Cleopatra.
                             The king, Contending with the fretful elements, Bids the wind blow the earth into the sea, Or swell the curled waters. Shakespeare's King Lear.
 The heavens and the earth will pass away, and the elements melt with fervent heat. Peter.
 Here be four of you were able to make a good world; for you are as differing as the four elements. Bacon's Hol. War.
 He from his flaming ship his children sent, To perish in a milder element. Waller.
 The proper habitation or sphere of any thing: as water of fish.
 We are simple men; we do not know she works by charms, by spells, and such dawbry as is beyond our element. Shakesp.
 Our torments may, in length of time, Became our elements. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 275.
 They shew that they are out of their element, and that logick is none of their talent. Baker's Reflections on Learning.
 An ingredient; a constituent part.
             Who set the body and the limbs Of this great sport together, as you guess? — One sure that promises no element In such a business. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
 The letters of any language.

 The lowest or first rudiments of literature or science.
 With religion it fareth as with other sciences; the first delivery of the elements thereof must, for like consideration, be framed according to the weak and slender capacity of young beginners. Hooker, b. v. s. 18.
 Every parish should keep a petty schoolmaster, which should bring up children in the first elements of letters. Spenser on Irel.
 We, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world. Gal. iv. 3.
 There is nothing more pernicious to a youth, in the elements of painting, than an ignorant master. Dryden's Dufresn.

Element (verb)
To Élement. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To compound of elements.
 Whether any one such body be met with, in those said to be elemented bodies, I now question. Boyle's Scept. Chym.
 To constitute; to make as a first principle.
 Dull sublunary lover's love, Whose soul is sense, cannot admit Of absence, 'cause it doth remove The thing which elemented it. Donne.

Elemental
Eleméntal. adj. [from element.]

 Produced by some of the four elements.
 If dusky spots are vary'd on his brow, And streak'd with red, a troubl'd colour show; That sullen mixture shall at once declare Winds, rain and storms, and elemental war. Dryden's Virg.
 Soft yielding minds to water glide away, And sip, with nymphs, their elemental tea. Pope.
 Arising from first principles.
 Leeches are by some accounted poison not properly, that is, by temperamental contrariety, occult form, or so much as elemental repugnancy; but inwardly taken, they fasten upon the veins, and occasion an effusion of blood. Brown's Vu. Err.

Elementarity
Elementárity. n.s. [from elementary.] Containing the rudiments or first principles; simplicity of nature; absence of composition; being uncompounded.
 A very large class of creatures in the earth, far above the condition of elementarity. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 1.

Elementary
Eleméntary. adj. [from elementary.] Uncompounded; having only one principle or constituent part.
 All rain water contains in it a copious sediment of terrestrial matter, and is not a simple elementary water. Ray on the Creat.
 The elementary salts of animals are not the same as they appear by distillation. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Elemi
Elémi. n.s.
This drug is improperly called gum elemi, being a resin. The genuine elemi is brought from Æthiopia in flattish masses, or in cylinders, of a yellowish colour. Its smell is acrid and resinous. It is very rare in Europe, and supposed to be produced by a tree of the olive kind. The spurious or American elemi, almost the only kind known, is of a whitish colour, with a greater or less tinge of a greenish or yellowish. It is of an agreeable smell, and of an acrid and bitterish taste. It proceeds from a tall tree, which the Brasilians wound at night, and in the morning collect the resin that has run out. Hill's Materia Medica.

Elench
Elénch. n.s. [elenchus, Latin.] An argument; a sophism.
 The first delusion Satan put upon Eve, and his whole tentation might be the same elench continued, as when he said, Ye shall not die; that was, in his equivocation, you shall not incur present death. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. i. c. 4.
 Discover the fallacies of our common adversary, that old sophister, who puts the most abusive elenchs on us. De. of Piety.

Elephant
Élephant. n.s. [elephas, Latin.]

 The largest of all quadrupeds, of whose sagacity, faithfulness, prudence, and even understanding, many surprising relations are given. This animal is not carnivorous, but feeds on hay, herbs, and all sorts of pulse; and it is said to be extremely long lifed. It is naturally very gentle; but when enraged, no creature is more terrible. He is supplied with a trunk, or long hollow cartilage, like a large trumpet, which hangs between his teeth, and serves him for hands: by one blow with his trunk he will kill a camel or a horse, and will raise a prodigious weight with it. His teeth are the ivory so well known in Europe, some of which have been seen as large as a man's thigh, and a fathom in length. Wild elephants are taken with the help of a female ready for the male: she is confined to a narrow place, round which pits are dug; and these being covered with a little earth scattered over hurdles, the male elephants easily fall into the snare. In copulation the female receives the male lying upon her back; and such is his pudicity, that he never covers the female so long as any one appears in sight. Calmet.
                 He loves to hear, That unicorns may be betray'd with trees, And bears with glasses, elephants with holes. Sh. Jul. Cæs.
 The elephant hath joints, but not for courtesy; His legs are for necessity, not flexure. Sh. Troil. and Cressida.
 Ivory; the teeth of elephants.
 High o'er the gate, in elephant and gold, The crowd shall Cæsar's Indian war behold. Dryden's Virg.

Eleven
Eléven. adj. [ændlefen, Saxon.] Ten and one; one more than ten.
 Had I a dozen sons, each in my love alike, and none less dear than thine and my good Marcius, I had rather eleven die nobly for their country, than one voluptuously surfeit out of action. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.

Eleventh
Eléventh. adj. [from eleven.] The next in order to the tenth.
 In the eleventh chapter he returns to speak of the building of Babel. Raleigh's History of the World.

Elf (noun)


Elixation


Ellipsis


Elucidate
To Elúcidate. v.a. [elucido, Latin.] To explain; to clear; to make plain.
To elucidate a little the matter, let us consider it. Boyle.

Enable
To Ena'ble. v.a. [from able.] To make able; to confer power; to give strength or ability.
    If thou would'st vouchsafe to overspreadMe with the shadow of thy gentle wing,I should enabled be thy acts to sing. Spenser's Hymn on Love.
His great friendship with God might enable him, and his compassion might incline him. Atterbury's Sermon.
He points out to him the way of life, strengthens his weakness, restores his lapses, and enables him to walk and preserve in it. Rogers, Sermon 14.

Encomium
Encómium. n.s. [ἐγκώμιον.] Panegyrick; praise; elogy.
 How eagerly do some men propagate every little encomium their parasites make of them. Government of the Tongue, s. 9.
 A vile encomium doubly ridicules; There's nothing blackens like the ink of fools. Pope.

Encyclopedia
Encyclopédia.Encyclopédy.

n.s. [ἐγκυκλοπαιδεια.] The circle of sciences; the round of learning.


 Every science borrows from all the rest, and we cannot attain any single one without the encyclopædy. Glanv. Sceps. c. 25.
 This art may justly claim a place in the encyclopædia, especially such as serves for a model of education for an able politician. Arbuthnot's History of John Bull.

Encyclopedy
Encyclopédia.Encyclopédy.

n.s. [ἐγκυκλοπαιδεια.] The circle of sciences; the round of learning.


 Every science borrows from all the rest, and we cannot attain any single one without the encyclopædy. Glanv. Sceps. c. 25.
 This art may justly claim a place in the encyclopædia, especially such as serves for a model of education for an able politician. Arbuthnot's History of John Bull.

Energy
Énergy. n.s. [ἐνέργεια.]

 Power not exerted in action.
 They are not effective of any thing, nor leave no work behind them, but are energies merely; for their working upon mirrours, and places of echo, doth not alter any thing in those bodies. Bacon.
 Force; vigour; efficacy; influence.
 Whether with particles of heav'nly fire The God of nature did his soul inspire; Or earth, but new divided from the sky, And pliant still, retain'd th' ethereal energy. Dryden.
 God thinketh with operation infinitely perfect, with an omnipotent as well as an eternal energy. Grew's Cosmol. Sac.
 Beg the blessed Jesus to give an energy to your imperfect prayers, by his most powerful intercession. Smalridge's Serm.
                     What but God! Inspiring God! who, boundless spirit all, And unremitting energy, pervades, Adjusts, sustains, and agitates the whole. Thomson's Spring.
 Faculty; operation.
 Matter, though divided into the subtilest parts, moved swiftly, is senseless and stupid, and makes no approach to vital energy. Ray on the Creation.
 How can concussion of atoms beget self-consciousness, and other powers and energies that we feel in our minds? Bentley.
 Strength of expression; force of signification; spirit; life.
 Who did ever, in French authors, see The comprehensive English energy. Roscommon.
 Swift and ready, and familiar communication is made by speech; and, when animated by elocution, it acquires a greater life and energy, ravishing and captivating the hearers. Holder.
 Many words deserve to be thrown out of our language, and not a few antiquated to be restored, on account of their energy and sound. Swift.

Engage (verb active)
To Engáge. v.a. [engager, French.]

 To make liable for a debt to a creditor.
I have engag'd myself to a dear friend,Engag'd my friend to his meer enemy. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
 To impawn; to stake.
They most perfidiously condemnThose that engag'd their lives for them. Hudibras, p. ii.
 To enlist; to bring into a party.
All wicked men are of a party against religion: some lust or interest engageth them against it. Tillotson's Sermons.
 To embark in an affair; to enter in an undertaking.
So far had we engaged ourselves, unfortunate souls, that we listed not to complain, since our complaints could not but carry the greatest accusation to ourselves. Sidney, b. ii.
Before I engage myself in giving any answer to this objection of inconsumptible lights, I would see the effect certainly averred. Digby on Bodies.
 To unite; to attach; to make adherent.
This humanity and good-nature engages every body to him, so that when he is pleasant upon any of them, all his family are in good humour. Addison's Spectator, № 100.
 To induce; to win by pleasing means; to gain.
To ev'ry duty he cou'd minds engage,Provoke their courage, and command their rage. Waller.
His beauty these, and those his blooming age,The rest his house and his own fame engage. Dryden's Æn.
So shall I court thy dearest truth,When beauty ceases to engage;So thinking on thy charming youth,I'll love it o'er again in age. Prior.
 To bind by any appointment or contract.
We have been firm to our allies, without declining any expence to which we had engaged ourselves, and we have even exceeded our engagement. Atterbury's Sermons.
 To seize by the attention.

 To employ; to hold in business.
For I shall sing of battles, blood and rage,Which princes and their people did engage. Dryden.
 To encouter; to fight.
The rebel knave, who dares his prince engage,Proves the just victim of his royal rage. Pope.

Engage (verb neuter)
To Engáge. v.n.

 To conflict; to fight.
Upon advertisement of the Scots army, the earl of Holland was sent with a body to meet and engage with it. Clarendon.
 To embark in any business; to enlist in any party.
'Tis not, indeed, my talent to engageIn lofty trifles, or to swell my pageWith wind and noise. Dryden's Pers. Sat. 5.

Engagement
Engágement. n.s. [from engage; engagement, French.]

 The act of engaging, impawning, or making liable to a debt.

 Obligation by contract.
We have, in expence of blood, exceeded our engagements. Atterbury's Sermons.
 Adherence to a party or cause; partiality.
This practice may be obvious to any who impartially, and without engagement, is at the pains to examine. Swift.
 Employment of  the attention.
Play, either by our too constant or too long engagement in it, becomes like an employment or profession. Rogers's Serm.
 Fight; conflict; battle.
Our army, led by valiant Torrismond,Is now in hot engagement with the Moors. Dryden.
Encourag'd by despair, or obstinateTo fall like men in arms, some dare renewFeeble engagement, meeting glorious fateOn the firm land. Phillips.
 Obligation; motive.
This is the greatest engagement not to forfeit an opportunity. Hammond's Fundamentals.

Engaol
To Enga'ol. v.a. [from gaol.] To imprison; to confine.
Within my mouth you have engaol'd my tongue, Doubly portcullis'd with my teeth and lips. Shakes. R. II.

Engarrison
To Enga'rrison. v.a. [from garrison.] To protect by a garrison.
Neptune with a flying guard doth engarrison her strongly. Howel's Vocal Forrest.

Engel
E'ngle. n.s. [derived from the French engluer, to catch with birdlime.] A gull; a put; a bubble.  Hanmer.
                                         I spied An ancient engle going down the hill, Will serve our turn. Shakesp. Taming of the Shrew.
An alteration of Theobald's for angel.

Engender (verb active)
To Enge'nder. v.a. [engendrer, French.]

 To beget between different sexes.
 This bastard love is engendered betwixt lust and idleness. Sid.
 To produce; to form.
 Oh nature! thou, who of the self-same mettle, Whereof thy proud child, arrogant man, is pufft, Engender'st the black toad and adder blue. Shakesp. Timon.
 Again, if souls do other souls beget, 'Tis by themselves, or by the body's pow'r: If by themselves, what doth their working let, But they might souls engender ev'ry hour? Davies.
 To excite; to cause; to produce.
 Say, can you fast?  Your stomachs are too young, And abstinence engenders maladies. Shakes. Love's Lab. Lost.
 The presence of a king engenders love Amongst his subjects and his loyal friends. Shakes. Henry VI.
 That engenders thunder in his breast, And makes him roar these accusations forth. Shakes. H. VI.
 It unloads the mind, engenders thoughts, and animates virtue. Addison's Spectator, №. 93.
 To bring forth.
 Vice engenders shame, and folly broods o'er grief. Prior.

Engender (verb neuter)
To Enge'nder. v.n. To be caused; to be produced.
Thick clouds are spread, and storms engender there. Dryd.

Engine
E'ngine. n.s. [engin, French; ingegne, Italian.]

 Any mechanical complication, in which various movements and parts concur to one effect.

 A military machine.
 This is our engine, towers that overthrows; Our spear that hurts, our sword that wounds our foes. Fairf.
 Any instrument.
 The sword, the arrow, the gun, with many terrible engines of death, will be employed. Raleigh's Essays.
 He takes the scissars, and extends The little engine on his fingers ends. Pope's Rape of the Lock.
 Any instrument to throw water upon burning houses.
 Some cut the pipes, and some the engines play; And some more bold, mount ladders to the fire. Dryden.
 Any means used to bring to pass, or to effect.  Usually in an ill sense.
 Prayer must be divine and heavenly, which the devil with all his engines so violently opposeth. Duppa's Rules for Devotion.
 An agent for another.  In contempt.
 They had th' especial engines been, to rear His fortunes up into the state they were.

Engineer
Engine'er. n.s. [engingnier, French.] One who manages engines; one who directs the artillery of an army.
For 'tis the sport to have the engineer Hoist with his own petard. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
                         Him thus enrag'd, Descrying from afar, some engineer, Dext'rous to guide th' unerring charge, design'd By one nice shot to terminate the war. Phillips.
An author, who points his satire at a great man, is like the engineer who signalized himself by this ungenerous practice. Addison's Freeholder, №. 19.

Enginery
E'nginery. n.s. [from engine.]

 The act of managing artillery.
 They may descend in mathematicks to fortification, architecture, enginery, or navigation. Milton on Education.
 Engines of war; artillery.
                             We saw the foe Approaching, gross and huge, in hollow cube Training his dev'lish enginery. Milton.

Engird
To Engi'rd. v.a. [from gird.] To encircle; to surround; to environ; to encompass.
             My heart is drown'd with grief, My body round engir't with misery; For what's more miserable than discontent? Shak. Hen. VI.
That gold must round engirt these brows of mine. Shakes.

English (adjective)
Énglish. adj. [enʒles, Saxon.] Belonging to England; thence English is the language of England.
 He hath neither Latin, French, nor Italian; and you may come into the court, and swear that I have a poor pennyworth in the English. Shakespeare's Merchant of Venice.
Of English talc, the coarser sort is called plaister, or parget; the finer, spoad. Woodward.

English (verb)
To Énglish. v.a. [from the noun.] To translate into English.
 We find not a word in the text can properly be rendered anise, which is what the Latins call anethum, and properly Englished dill. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vii. c. 7.

Enseam
To Enseam. v.a. [from seam.] To sow up; to inclose by a seam or juncture of needlework.
A name engraved in the revestiary of the temple, watched by two brazen dogs, one stole away, and enseamed it in his thigh. Camden's Remains.

Ensear
To Ense'ar. v.a. [from sear.] To cauterise; to stanch or stop with fire.
Ensear thy fertile and conceptious womb; Let it no more bring out t' ingrateful man. Shakesp. Timon.

Enshield
To Enshi'eld. v.a. [from shield.] To shield; to cover; to protect.
                             These black masks Proclaim an enshield beauty, ten times louder Than beauty could display. Shak. Measure for Measure.

Enshrine
To Enshri'ne. v.a. [from shrine.] To inclose in a chest or cabinet; to preserve and secure as a thing sacred.
                                 He seems A phœnix, gaz'd by all, as that sole bird, When to enshrine his reliques in the sun's Bright temple, to Egyptian Thebes he flies. Milt. Pa. Lost.
                         The sots combine With pious care a monkey to enshrine. Tate's Juv. Sat.
Fair fortune next, with looks serene and kind, Receives 'em, in her ancient fane enshrin'd. Addison.

Ensiform
E'nsiform. adj. [ensiformis, Latin.] Having the shape of a sword, as the xiphoeides or ensiform cartilage.

Envoy
Énvoy. n.s. [envoye, French.]

 A publick minister sent from one power to another.
                 Now the Lycian lots conspire With Phœbus; now Jove's envoy through the air Brings dismal tydings. Denham.
 Perseus sent envoys to Carthage, to kindle their hatred against the Romans. Arbuthnot on Coins.
 A publick messenger, in dignity below an ambassador.

 A messenger.
 The watchful sentinels at ev'ry gate, At ev'ry passage to the senses wait; Still travel to and fro' the nervous way, And their impressions to the brain convey; Where their report the vital envoys make, And with new orders are commanded back. Blackm. Creat.

Epigram
Epigrám. n.s. [epigramma, Latin.] A short poem terminating in a point.
 A college of witcrackers cannot flout me out of my humour: do'st thou think I care for a satire or an epigram? Shak.
 What can be more witty than the epigram of Moore upon the name of Nicolaus, an ignorant physician, that had been the death of thousands? Peacham of Poetry.
                                 I writ An epigram that boasts more truth than wit. Gay.

Epiphyllospermous
Epiphyllospérmous. adj. [from ὲπὶ, φύλλον and σπέρμα.] Is applied to plants that bear their seed on the back part of their leaves, being the same with capillaries. Harris.

Epiphysis
Epíphysis.. n.s. [ἐπίφυσις.] Accretion; the part added by accretion; one bone growing to another by simple contiguity, without any proper articulation. Quincy.
The epiphysis of the os femoris is a distinct bone from it in a child, whereas in a man they do entirely unite. Wiseman.

Epiploce
Epíploce. n.s. [ἐπιπλοκὴ.] A figure of rhetorick, by which one aggravation, or striking circumstance, is added in due graduation to another; as, he not only spared his enemies, but continued them in employment; not only continued, but advanced them.

Episcopacy
Epíscopacy. n.s. [episcopatus, Latin.] The government of bishops; the government of the church established by the apostles.
They durst not contest with the assembly in jurisdiction; so that there was little more than the name of episcopacy preserved. Clarendon.
Prelacy itself cannot be proved by prescription, since episcopacy is not prescribed by any time whatsoever. Ayliffe's Par.

Episcopal
Epíscopal. adj. [from episcopus, Latin.]

 Belonging to a bishop.
The apostle commands Titus not only to be a pattern of good works himself, but to use his episcopal authority in exhorting every rank and order of men. Rogers's Sermons.
 Vested in a bishop.
The plot of discipline sought to erect a popular authority of elders, and to take away episcopal jurisdiction. Hooker.

Episcopate
Epíscopate. n.s. [episcopatus, Latin.] A bishoprick; the office and dignity of a bishop.

Episode
Épisode. n.s. [ἐπίσωδη.] An incidental narrative, or digression in a poem, separable from the main subject, yet rising naturally from it.
The poem, which we have now under our consideration, hath no other episodes than such as naturally arise from the subject. Addison's Spectator.

Episodical
Episódical.Episódick.

adj. [from episode.] Contained in an episode; pertaining to an episode.


Episodical ornaments, such as descriptions and narrations, were delivered to us from the observations of Aristotle. Dryd.
I discover the difference between the episodick and principal action, as well as the nature of episodes. Notes on the Odyssey.

Episodick
Episódical.Episódick.

adj. [from episode.] Contained in an episode; pertaining to an episode.


Episodical ornaments, such as descriptions and narrations, were delivered to us from the observations of Aristotle. Dryd.
I discover the difference between the episodick and principal action, as well as the nature of episodes. Notes on the Odyssey.

Epispastick
Epispástick. n.s. [ἔπι and σπάω.]

 Drawing.

 Blistering. This is now the more frequent, though less proper sense.
The matter ought to be solicited, by all possible methods, to the lower parts, by fomentations, bathing, epispasticks, and blistering. Arbuthnot on Diet.

Epistle
Epístle. n.s. [ἐπιστολὴ.] A letter.  This word is seldom used but in poetry, or on occasions of dignity and solemnity.
When loose epistles violate chaste eyes,She half consents, who silently denies. Dryden.

Epistler
Epístler. n.s. [from epistle.] A scribbler of letters.

Epistolary
Epístolary. adj. [from epistle.]

 Relating to letters; suitable to letters.

 Transacted by letters.
I shall carry on an epistolary correspondence between the two heads. Addison's Guardian, № 114.

Epitaph
Épitaph. n.s. [ἐπιτάφιο.] An inscription upon a tomb.
Live still, and write mine epitaph. Shakespeare.


Some thy lov'd dust in Parian stones enshrine,Others immortal epitaphs design;With wit, and strength, that only yields to thine.

  Smith.

Epithalamium
Epithalámium. n.s. [ἐπὶ θάλαμος.] A nuptial song; a compliment upon marriage.
I presume to invite you to these sacred nuptials: the epithalamium sung by a crowned muse. Sandys's Paraphrase.
The forty-fifth psalm is an epithalamium to Christ and the church, or to the lamb and his spouse. Burnet.

Epithem
Épithem. n.s. [ἐπίθημα.] A liquid medicament externally applied.
Epithems, or cordial applications, are justly applied unto the left breast. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 1.
Cordials and epithems are also necessary, to resist the putrefaction and strengthen the vitals. Wiseman's Surgery.

Epithet
Épithet. n.s. [ἐπίθετον.]

 An adjective denoting any quality good or bad: as, the verdant grove, the craggy mountain's lofty head.
I affirm with phlegm, leaving the epithets of false, scandalous and villainous to the author. Swift.
 It is used by some writers improperly for title, name.
The epithet of shades belonged more properly to the darkness than the refreshment. Decay of Piety.
 It is used improperly for phrase, expression.
For which of my good parts did you first suffer love for me?— Suffer love! a good epithet: I do suffer love indeed; for I love thee against my will. Shakespeare.

Epitome
Epítome. n.s. [ἐπιτομὴ.] Abridgment; abbreviature; compendious abstract; compendium.
                        This is a poor epitome of your's,Which, by th' interpretation of full time,May shew like all yourself. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.
Epitomes are helpful to the memory, and of good private use; but set forth for publick monuments, accuse the industrious writers of delivering much impertinency. Wotton.
I think it would be well, if there were a short and plain epitome made, containing the chief and most material heads. Locke on Education.
Such abstracts and epitomes may be reviewed in their proper places. Watt's Improvement of the Mind.

Epitomise
To Epi'tomise. v.a. [from epitome.]

 To abstract; to contract into a narrow space.


Who did the whole world's soul contract, and drove


Into the glasses of your eyes;So made such mirrours and such spies,That they did all to you epitomise.

  Donne.



 Less properly, to diminish; to curtail.
We have epitomised many particular words, to the detriment of our tongue. Addison's Spectator, № 135.

Epitomiser
Epítomiser.Epítomist.

n.s. [from epitomise.] An abridger; an abstracter; a writer of epitomes.

Epitomist
Epítomiser.Epítomist.

n.s. [from epitomise.] An abridger; an abstracter; a writer of epitomes.

Epoch
Époch.Épocha.

n.s. [ἐποχὴ.] The time at which a new computation is begun; the time from which dates are numbered.


Moses distinctly sets down this account, computing by certain intervals, memorable æras and epochas, or terms of time. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vi. c. 1.
These are the practices of the world, since the year sixty; the grand epoch of falshood, as well as debauchery. South.
Some lazy ages, lost in sleep and ease,No action leave to busy chronicles;Such whose supine felicity but makesIn story chasms, in epochas mistakes. Dryden.
Their several epochas or beginnings, as from the creation of the world, from the flood, from the first olympiad, from the building of Rome, or from any remarkable passage or accident, give us a pleasant prospect into the histories of antiquity and of former ages. Holder on Time.
Time is always reckoned from some known parts of this sensible world, and from some certain epochs marked out to us by the motions observable in it. Locke.
Time, by necessity compel'd, shall goThrough scenes of war, and epochas of woe. Prior.

Epocha
Époch.Épocha.

n.s. [ἐποχὴ.] The time at which a new computation is begun; the time from which dates are numbered.


Moses distinctly sets down this account, computing by certain intervals, memorable æras and epochas, or terms of time. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vi. c. 1.
These are the practices of the world, since the year sixty; the grand epoch of falshood, as well as debauchery. South.
Some lazy ages, lost in sleep and ease,No action leave to busy chronicles;Such whose supine felicity but makesIn story chasms, in epochas mistakes. Dryden.
Their several epochas or beginnings, as from the creation of the world, from the flood, from the first olympiad, from the building of Rome, or from any remarkable passage or accident, give us a pleasant prospect into the histories of antiquity and of former ages. Holder on Time.
Time is always reckoned from some known parts of this sensible world, and from some certain epochs marked out to us by the motions observable in it. Locke.
Time, by necessity compel'd, shall goThrough scenes of war, and epochas of woe. Prior.

Epode
Epóde. n.s. [ἔπωδος.] The stanza following the strophe and antistrophe.

Epopee
Epopée. n.s. [ἐποποίια.] An epick or heroick poem.
Tragedy borrows from the epopee, and that which borrows is of less dignity, because it has not of its own. Dryd. Virgil.

Epulation
Epulátion. n.s. [epulatio, Latin.] Banquet; feast.
Contented with bread and water, when he would dine with Jove, and pretended to epulation, he desired no other addition than a piece of cheese. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vii. c. 17.

Epulotick
Epulótick. n.s. [ἐπουλώτικος.] A cicatrising medicament.
The ulcer, incarned with common sarcoticks, and the ulcerations about it, were cured by ointment of tuty, and such like epuloticks. Wiseman of Instammation.

Equation
Equátion. n.s. [æquare, Latin.] The investigation of a mean proportion collected from the extremities of excess and defect, to be applied to the whole.
 We are to find out the extremities on both sides, and from and between them the middle daily motions of the sun along the Ecliptick; and to frame tables of equation of natural days, to be applied to the mean motion of addition or substraction, as the case shall require. Holder on Time.
 By an argument taken from the equations of the times of the eclipses of Jupiter's satellites, it seems that light is propagated in time, spending in its passage from the sun to us about seven minutes of time. Newton's Opt.

Equation (algebra)
Equation. [In algebra.] Is an expression of the same quantity in two dissimilar terms, but of equal value; as 3 s. = 36 d. Dict.

Equation (astronomy)
Equation. [In astronomy.] The difference between the time marked out by the sun's apparent motion, and the time that is measured by its real or middle motion; according to which clocks and watches ought to be adjusted. Dict.

Ere
Ere. adv. [ær, Saxon; air, Gothick; eer, Dutch. This word is sometimes vitiously written e'er, as if from ever. It is likewise written or before ever, or and ær in Saxon being indiscriminately written. Mr. Lye.] Before; sooner than.
Ere he would have hang'd a man for the getting a hundred bastards, he would have paid for the nursing a thousand. Shak.
The lions brake all their bones in pieces or ever they came to the bottom of the den. Daniel.
            Just trial, ere I meritMy exaltation without change or end. Milt. Par. Regain'd.
The mountain trees in distant prospect please,Ere yet the pine descended to the seas;Ere sails were spread new oceans to explore. Dryden's Ovid.
                      Our fruitful NileFlow'd ere the wonted season. Dryden's All for Love.
The birds shall cease to tune their ev'ning song,The winds to breathe, the waving woods to move,And streams to murmer, ere I cease to love. Pope's Autumn.

Erect (adjective)
Ere'ct. adj. [erectus, Latin.]

 Upright; not leaning; not prone.
Birds, far from proneness, are almost erect; advancing the head and breast in progression, only prone in volitation. Brown.
Basil tells us, that the serpent went erect like man. Brown.
 Directed upwards.
                        Vain were vows,And plaints, and suppliant hands, to heav'n erect. Phillips.
 Bold; confident; unshaken.
Let no vain fear thy gen'rous ardour tame;But stand erect, and sound as loud as fame. Granville.
 Vigorous; not depressed.
That vigilant and erect attention of mind, which in prayer is very necessary, is wasted or dulled. Hooker, b. v. s. 33.

Erect (verb active)
To Ere'ct. v.a. [erectus, Latin.]

 To raise in a strait line; to place perpendicularly to the horizon.

 To Erect a Perpendicular. To cross one line by another at right angles.

 To raise; to build.
                Happier walls expect,Which, wand'ring long, at last thou shalt erect. Dryd. Virg.
There are many monuments erected to benefactors to the republick. Addison's Remarks on Italy.
 To establish anew; to settle.
Great difference there is between their proceedings, who erect a new commonwealth which is to have neither regiment nor religion the same that was, and theirs who only reform a decayed estate. Hooker, b. v. s. 17.
He suffers seventy-two distinct nations to be erected out of the first monarchy, under distinct governours. Raleigh.
 To elevate; to exalt.
I, who am a party, am not to erect myself a judge. Dryden's Fables, Preface.
I am far from pretending infallibility: that would be to erect myself into an apostle. Locke on St. Paul's Epistles.
 To raise consequences from premises.
Men being too hasty to erect to themselves general notions and ill-grounded theories, find themselves deceived in their stock of knowledge. Locke.
Malebranche erects this proposition, of seeing all things in God, upon their ruin. Locke.
 To animate; not to depress; to encourage.
          Why should not hopeAs much erect our thoughts, as fear deject them. Denham.

Erect (verb neuter)
To Ere'ct. v.n. To rise upright.
The trefoil against rain swelleth in the stalk, and so standeth more upright; for by wet stalks do erect, and leaves bow down. Bacon's Natural History, № 827.

Erection
Ere'ction. n.s. [from erect.]

 The act of raising, or state of being raised upward.
We are to consider only the erection of the hills above the ordinary land. Brerewood on Languages.
 The act of building or raising edifices.
The first thing which moveth them thus to cast up their poison, are certain solemnities usual at the first erection of churches. Hooker, b. v. s. 12.
Pillars were set up above one thousand four hundred and twenty-six years before the flood, counting Seth to be an hundred years old at the erection of them. Raleigh's History.
 Establishment; settlement.
It must needs have a peculiar influence upon the erection, countinuance, and dissolution of every society. South's Serm.
 Elevation; exaltation of sentiments.
Her peerless height my mind to high erection draws up. Sidn.

Erectness
Ere'ctness. n.s. [from erect.] Uprightness of posture or form.
We take erectness strictly as Galen defined it: they only, sayeth he, have an erect figure, whose spine and thighbone are carried on right lines. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 1.

Eremite
E'remite. n.s. [eremita, Latin; ἔρημος.] One who lives in a wilderness; one who lives in solitude; an hermit; a solitary.
Antonius the eremite findeth a fifth commodity not inferior to any of these four. Raleigh's History of the World.
                    And many more too long,Embryoes and idiots, eremites and friars,White, black, and grey, with all their trumpery. Milton.

Eremitical
Eremi'tical. adj. [from eremite.] Religiously solitary; leading the life of an hermit.
They have multitudes of religious orders, eremitical and cenobitical. Stillingfleet.

Ereptation
Erepta'tion. n.s. [erepto, Latin.] A creeping forth. Bail.

Ereption
Ere'ption. n.s. [ereptis, Latin.] A snatching or taking away by force. Bail.

Ergot
E'rgot. n.s. A sort of stub, like a piece of soft horn, about the bigness of a chesnut, which is placed behind and below the pastern joint, and is commonly hid under the tuft of the fetlock. Farrier's Dict.

Eringo
Eri'ngo. n.s. Sea-holly, a plant.

Eristical
Eri'stical. adj. [ἔρις.] Controversial; relating to dispute; containing controversies.

Erke
Erke. n.s. [aꞅᵹ, Saxon.] Idle; lazy; slothful. An old word.
For men therein should hem delite;And of that dede be not erke,But oft sithes haunt that werke. Chaucer.

Ermine
E'rmine. n.s. [hermine, French, from armenius, Latin.]  An animal that is found in cold countries, and which very nearly resembles a weasle is shape; having a white pile, and the tip of the tail black, and furnishing a choice and valuable fur.  The fellmongers and furriers put upon it little bits of Lombardy lambskin, which is noted for its shining black colour, the better to set off the whiteness of the ermine. Trevoux.
Ermine is the fur of a little beast, about the bigness of a weasel, called Mus Armenius; for they are found in Armenia. Peacham on Blazoning.
                 A lady's honour must be touch'd; Which, nice as ermines, will not bear a soil. Dryden.
Fair ermines, spotless as the snows they press. Thomson.

Ermined
E'rmined. adj. [from ermine.]  Cloathed with ermine.
Arcadia's countess, here in ermin'd pride, Is there Pastora by a fountain side. Pope's Epistles.

Erne
E'rne.E'ron.

 Do immediately flow from the Saxon ꞃn, aꞃn, a cottage, or place of retirement. Gibson's Camden.

Erode
To Ero'de. v.a. [erodo, Latin.]  To canker, or eat away; to corrode.
 It hath been anciently received, that the sea-hare hath antipathy with the lungs, if it cometh near the body, and erodeth them. Bacon's Natural History, №. 983.
The blood, being too sharp or thin, erodes the vessel. Wise.

Erogation
Eroga'tion. n.s. [erogatio, Latin.] The act of giving or bestowing; distribution.

Eron
E'rne.E'ron.

 Do immediately flow from the Saxon ꞃn, aꞃn, a cottage, or place of retirement. Gibson's Camden.

Erosion
Ero'sion. n.s. [erosio, Latin.]

 The act of eating away.

 The state of being eaten away; canker; corrosion.
 As sea-salt is a sharp solid body, when taken in too great quantities, in a constant diet of salt meat, it breaks the vessels, produceth erosions of the solid parts, and all the symptoms of the sea-scurvy. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Err
To Err. v.n. [erro, Latin.]

 To wander; to ramble.
 A storm of strokes, well meant, with fury flies, And errs about their temples, ears, and eyes. Dryden's Virg.
 The rains arise, and fires their warmth dispense;And fix'd and erring stars dispose their influence. Dryd. Virg.
 To miss the right way; to stray.
 We have erred and strayed like lost sheep. Common Prayer.
 To deviate from any purpose.
 But errs not nature from this gracious end, From burning suns when livid deaths descend. Pope's Essays.
 To commit errours; to mistake.
 It is a judgment maim'd and most imperfect, That will confess perfection so could err, Against all rules of nature. Shakespeare's Othello.
 Do they not err that devise evil? Prov. xiv. 22.
 Possibly the man may err in his judgment of circumstances, and therefore let him fear; but because it is not certain he is mistaken, let him not despair. Taylor's Rule of living holy.
 Nor has it only been the heat of erring persons that has been thus mischievous, but sometimes men of right judgments have too much contributed to the breach. Decay of Piety.
 The muses' friend, unto himself severe, With silent pity looks on all that err. Waller.
 He who from the reflected image of the sun in water would conclude of light and heat, could not err more grosly. Cheyne.

Errable
E'rrable.  adj. [from err.] Liable to err; liable to mistake.

Errableness
E'rrableness. n.s. [from errable.] Liableness to error; liableness to mistake.
We may infer, from the errableness of our nature, the reasonableness of compassion to the seduced. Decay of Piety.

Errand
E'rrand. n.s. [æꞃnð, Saxon; arend, Danish.]  A message; something to be told or done by a messenger; a mandate; a commission.  It is generally used now only in familiar language.
Servants being commanded to go, shall stand still, 'till they have their errand warranted unto them. Hooker, b. ii. s. 8.
But hast thou done thy errand to Baptista?
— I told him that your father was in Venice. Shakespeare.
A quean! have I not forbid her my house? She comes of errands, does she? Shakespeare's Merry Wives of Windsor.
When he came, behold the captains of the host were sitting, and he said, I have an errand to thee, O captain. 2 Kings ix. 5.
                 From them I go This uncouth errand sole. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii.
                                His eyes, That run through all the heav'ns, or down to th' earth, Bear his swift errands, over moist and dry, O'er sea and land. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. iii. l. 652.
         Well thou do'st to hide from common sight Thy close intrigues, too bad to bear the light; Nor doubt I, but the silver-footed dame, Tripping from sea, on such an errand came. Dryd. Homer.

Errant
Erra'nt. adj. [errans, Latin; errant, French.]

 Wandering; roving; rambling.  Particularly applied to an order of knights much celebrated in romances, who roved about the world in search of adventures.
 There are just seven planets, or errant  stars, in the lower orbs of heaven; but it is now demonstrable unto sense, that there are many more. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 12.
 Chief of domestick knights and errant, Either for chartel or for warrant. Hudibras.
 Vile; abandoned; completely bad.  See Arrant.
 Any way, so thou wilt do it, good impertinence: Thy company, if I slept not very well A-nights, would make me an errant fool with questions. Johnson's Catiline.

Errantry
Érrantry. n.s. [from errant]

 An errant state; the condition of a wanderer.
 After a short space of errantry upon the seas, he got safe back to Dunkirk. Addison's Freeholder, №. 36.
 The employment of a knight errant.

Errata
Erráta. n.s. [Latin.] The faults of the printer inserted in the beginning or end of the book.
 If he meets with faults, besides those that the errata take notice of, he will consider the weakness of the author's eyes. Boyle.

Erratically
Errátically. adv. [from erratical or erratick.] Without rule; without any established method or order.
 They come not forth in generations erratical, or different from each other; but in specifical and regular shapes. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 6.

Erratick
Errátick. adj. [erraticus, Latin.]

 Wandering; uncertain; keeping no certain order; holding no established course.
             The earth, and each erratick world, Around the sun their proper center whirl'd, Compose but one extended vast machine. Blackm. Creation.
 Through the vast waves the dreadful wonders move, Hence nam'd erratick. Pope's Odyssey, b. xii. l. 75.
 Irregular; changeable.
 They are incommoded with a slimy mattery cough, stink of breath, and an erratick fever. Harvey on Consumptions.

Errhine
Érrhine. n.s. [ἐῥῤινα.] Snuffed up the nose; occasioning sneezing.
 We see sage or betony bruised, sneezing powder, and other powders or liquors, which the physicians call errhines, put into the nose to draw phlegm and water from the head. Bacon's Natural History, №. 38.

Erroneous
Erróneous. adj. [from erro, Latin.]

 Wandering; unsettled.
                             They roam Erroneous and disconsolate, themselves Accusing, and their chiefs improvident Of military chance. Phillips.
 This circle, by being placed here, stopped much of the erroneous light, which otherwise would have disturbed the vision. Newton's Opt.
 Unblam'd abundance crown'd the royal board, What time this done rever'd her prudent lord; Who now, so heav'n decrees, is doom'd to mourn, Bitter constraint! erroneous and forlorn. Pope's Odyssey, b. i.
 Irregular; wandering from the right road.
 If the vessels, instead of breaking, yield, it subjects the person to all the inconveniencies of erroneous circulation; that is, when the blood strays into the vessels destined to carry serum or lymph. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Mistaking; misled by errour.
 Thou art far from destroying the innocent with the guilty, and the erroneous with the malicious. King Charles.
 There is the erroneous as well as the rightly informed conscience. South's Sermons.
 Mistaken; not conformable to truth.
 Their whole counsel is in this point utterly condemned, as having either proceeded from the blindness of those times, or from negligence, or from desire of honour and glory, or from an erroneous opinion that such things might be for a while. Hooker, b. iv. s. 14.
 A wonderful erroneous observation that walketh about, is commonly received, contrary to all the true account of time and experience. Bacon's War with Spain.
 The phænomena of light have been hitherto explained by supposing that they arise from new modifications of the rays, which is an erroneous supposition. Newton's Opt.

Erroneously
Erróneously. adv. [from erroneous.] By mistake; not rightly.
 The minds of men are erroneously persuaded, that it is the will of God to have those things done which they fancy. Hooker.
 I could not discover the lenity and favour of this sentence; but conceived it, perhaps erroneously, rather to be rigorous than gentle. Gulliver's Travels.

Erroneousness
Erróneousness. n.s. [from erroneous.] Physical falsehood; inconformity to truth.
The phænomena may be explained by his hypothesis, whereof he demonstrates the truth, together with the erroneousness of ours. Boyle's Spring of the Air.

Errour
Érrour. n.s. [error, Latin.]

 Mistake; involuntary deviation from truth.
Errour is a mistake of our judgment giving assent to that which is not true. Locke.
    Oh, hateful errour, melancholy's child!Why do'st thou shew to the apt thoughts of men,The things that are not? Shakespeare's. Jul. Cæsar.
 A blunder; an act or assertion in which a mistake is committed.
              In religion,What damned errour, but some sober browWill bless it. Shakespeare's Merchant of Venice.
He look'd like nature's errour, as the mindAnd body were not of a piece design'd,But made for two, and by mistake in one were join'd. Dryd.
 Roving excursion; irregular course.
What brought you living to the Stygian state?Driv'n by the winds and errours of the sea,Or did you heav'n's superiour doom obey? Dryden's Æn.
 [In theology] Sin.
Blood he offered for himself, and for the errours of the people. Heb. ix. 7.
 [In law, more especially in our common law.] An errour in pleading, or in the process; and the writ, which is brought for remedy of this oversight, is called a writ of errour, which lies to redress false judgment given in any court of record. Cowel.

Escargatoire
Escárgatoire. n.s. [French.] A nursery of snails.
 At the Capuchins I saw escargatoires, which I took the more notice of, because I do not remember to have met with any thing of the same kind in other countries. It is a square place boarded in, and filled with a vast quantity of large snails that are esteemed excellent food, when they are well dressed. Add.

Escheat (noun)
Eschéat. n.s. [from the French eschevir.] Any lands, or other profits, that fall to a lord within his manor by forfeiture, or the death of his tenant, dying without heir general or especial.  Escheat is also used sometimes for the place in which the king, or other lord, has escheats of his tenants.  Thirdly, escheat is used for a writ, which lies where the tenant, having estate of fee-simple in any lands or tenements holden of a superiour lord, dies seised, without any heir general or especial; for, in this case, the lord brings this writ against him that possesses the lands after the death of his tenant, and shall thereby recover them. Cowel.
 If the king's ordinary courts of justice do not extend to protect the people, if he have no certain revenue or escheats, I cannot justly say that such a country is wholly conquered. Davies on Ireland.

Eschutcheon
Eschu'tcheon. n.s. The shield of the family; the picture of the ensigns armorial.
Eschutcheon is a French word, from the Latin scutum, leather; and hence cometh our English word buckler, lꞃ in the old Saxon signifying leather, and buck or bock a buck or stag; of whose skins, quilted close together with horn or hard wood, the ancient Britons made their shields. Peacham.
There be now, for martial encouragement, some degrees and orders of chivalry, and some remembrance perhaps upon the eschutcheon. Bacon's Essays.
We will pass over the eschutcheons of the tribes of Israel, as they are usually described in the maps of Canaan. Brown.

Escort (noun)
Esco'rt. n.s. [escort, French.] Convoy; guard from place to place.

Escort (verb)
To Esco'rt. v.a. [escorter, French.] To convoy; to guard from place to place.

Escot (noun)
Esco't. n.s. [French.] A tax paid in boroughs and corporations towards the support of the community, which is called scot and lot.

Escot (verb)
To Esco't. v.a. [from the noun.] To pay a man's reckoning; to support.
What, are they children? Who maintains them? How are they escoted? Shakespeare's Hamlet.

Escout
Escóut. n.s. [escouter, French.] Listeners or spies; persons sent for intelligence.
 They were well entrenched, having good escout abroad, and sure watch within. Hayward.

Escritoir
Escrítoir. n.s. [French.] A box with all the implements necessary for writing.

Escuage
Escu'age. n.s. [from escu, French, a shield.]
Escuage, that is service of the shield, is either uncertain or certain. Escuage uncertain is likewise twofold: first, where the tenant by his tenure is bound to follow his lord, going in person to the king's wars against his enemies, either himself, or to send a sufficient man in his place, at his cost, so many days as were agreed upon between the lord and his first tenant at the granting of the fee; and the days of such service seem to have been rated by the quantity of the land so holden: as, if it extend to a whole knight's fee, then the tenant was bound thus to follow his lord forty days. A knight's fee was so much land as, in those days, was accounted a sufficient living for a knight; and that was six hundred and eighty acres as some think, or eight hundred as others, or 15 l. per Annum. Sir Thomas Smith saith that census equestris is 40 l. revenue in free lands. If the law extend but to half a knight's fee, then the tenant is bound to follow his lord, as above is said, but twenty days. The other kind of this escuage uncertain is called castleward, where the tenant by his land is bound, either by himself or by some other, to defend a castle as often as it shall come to his course. Escuage certain is where the tenant is set at a certain sum of money, to be paid in lieu of such uncertain services: as that a man yearly pay for a knight's fee twenty shillings; for half his fee, ten shillings, or some like rate. Cowel.

Esculent (adjective)
Ésculent. adj. [esculentus, Latin.] Good for food; eatable.
I knew a man that would fast five days; but the same man used to have continually a great wisp of herbs that he smelled on, and some esculent herbs of strong scent, as garlick. Bacon.

Esculent (noun)
Ésculent. n.s. Something fit for food.
 This cutting off the leaves in plants, where the root is the esculent, as radish and parsnips, it will make the root the greater, and so it will do to the heads of onions; and where the fruit is the esculent, by strengthening the root, it will make the fruit also the greater. Bacon's Natural History, №. 474.

Espalier
Espa'lier. n.s. Trees planted and cut so as to join.
Plant your fairest tulips in places of shelter, and under espaliers. Evelyn's Kalendar.
Behold Villario's ten years toil complete His arbours darken, his espaliers meet. Pope, Epistle iv.

Esparcet
Espa'rcet. n.s. A kind of saint-foin, and by some judged to be the same. Mortimer's Husbandry.

Especial
Espe'cial. adj. [ specialis, Latin.] Principal; chief.
They had th' especial engines been, to rear His fortunes up. Daniel's Civil War.

Especially
Espe'cially. adv. [from especial.] Principally; chiefly; particularly; in a uncommon degree above any other.
I somewhat marvel, that they especially should think it absurd to oppose church government, a plain matter of action, unto matter of faith, who know that themselves divide the gospel into doctrine and discipline. Hooker, b. iii. s. 3.
Would you proceed especially against Caius Marcius? Shak.
This delight they take in doing of mischief, whereby I mean spoiling of any thing to no purpose; but more especially the pleasure they take to put any thing to pain that is capable of it, I cannot persuade myself to be any other than a foreign and introduced disposition. Locke.
Providence hath planted in all men a natural desire and curiosity of knowing things to come; and such things especialy as concern our particular happiness, or the general fate of mankind. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.

Esperance
Espe'rance. n.s. [French.] Hope.
                             To be worst, Stands still in esperance, lives not in fear. Shakesp. K.Lear.
Yet there is a credence in my heart, An esperance so obstinately strong,
That doth invert th' attest of eyes and ears. Shakespeare.

Espial
Espi'al n.s. [French, from espier.] A spy; a scout; one sent to bring intelligence.
Those four garrisons, issuing forth at such convenient times as they shall have intelligence, or espial upon the enemy, will drive him from one side to another. Spencer on Ireland.
                     As he march'd along, By your espials were discovered Two mightier troops. Shakesp.
                 'Spials have informed me, The English in the suburbs close entrench'd, Went through a secret grate. Shakesp. Hen. VI.
She had some secret espials to look abroad for graceful youths, to make Plantagenets. Bac. H. VII.

Esplanade
Esplanade. n.s. [French.] In fortification, the same with the glacis of the counterscarpe originally; but now it is taken for the empty space between the glacis of a citadel and the first houses of the town. Harris.

Espousal


Espousals
Espo'usals. n.s. without a singul. [sponsalia, Latin; espous, French.] The act of contracting or affiancing a man and woman to each other; the act or ceremony of betrothing.

Espouse


Espy (verb active)


Espy (verb neuter)


Esquire


Estrich
Éstrich. n.s. [commonly written ostrich.] The largest of birds.
                    To be furious, Is to be frighted out of fear; and, in that mood, The dove will peck the estridge. Shak. Anth. and Cleopatra.
The peacock, not at thy command, assumes His glorious train; nor estrich her rare plumes. Sandys.

Ethical
Éthical. adj. [ἤθιχος.] Moral; treating on morality.

Ethically
Éthically. adv. [from ethical.] According to the doctrines of morality.
 My subject leads me not to discourse ethically, but christianly of the faults of the tongue. Government of the Tongue.

Ethick
Éthick. adj. [ἤθίκος.] Moral; delivering precepts of morality. Whence Pope entitled part of his works Ethick Epistles.

Ethicks
Éthicks. n.s. without the singular. [ἠθικὴ.] The doctrine of morality; a system of morality.
 For of all moral virtues, she was all That ethicks speak of virtues cardinal. Donne.
 I will never set politicks against ethicks; especially for that true ethicks are but as a handmaid to divinity and religion. Bacon's War with Spain.
 Persius professes the stoick philosophy; the most noble, generous, and beneficial amongst all the sects who have given rules of ethicks. Dryden's Juvenal, Dedicat.
 If the atheists would live up to the ethicks of Epicurus himself, they would make few or no proselytes from the Christian religion. Bentley's Sermons.

Eucrasy
Eucrasy. n.s. [ἐυκρασία.] An agreeable well proportioned mixture of qualities, whereby a body is said to be in a good state of health. Quincy.

Eugh
Eugh. n.s. [This word is so written by most writers; but since the original iw, Saxon, or Welsh ywen, more favours the easier orthography of yew, I have referred it thither.] A tree.
At the first stretch of both his hands he drew,And almost join'd the horns of the tough eugh. Dryd. Æn.

Euphonical
Euphónical. adj. [from euphony.] Sounding agreeably. Dict.

Euphony
Eúphony. n.s. [ἐυφωνία.] An agreeable sound; the contrary to harshness.

Euphorbium
Euphórbium. n.s.

 A plant.
It hath flowers and fruit like the spurge, and is also full of an hot sharp milky juice. The plants are angular, and shaped somewhat like the cereus or torch-thistle. It is commonly beset with spines, and for the most part hath no leaves. Miller.
 A gum resin, brought to us always in drops or grains, of a bright yellow, between a straw and a gold colour, and a smooth glossy surface.  It has no great smell, but its taste is violently acrid and nauseous.  It is produced in the remoter parts of Africa, whence it is sent to Sallce, and thence transported into Europe. The plant is also common on the coast of Malabar; but the Africans only know the secret of collecting the gum.  It is used medicinally in sinapisms. Hill.

Euphrasy
Eúphrasy. n.s. [euphrasia, Latin.] The herb eyebright; a plant supposed to clear the sight.
            Then purg'd with euphrasy, and rue,The visual nerve; for he had much to see;And from the well of life three drops instill'd. Milt. P. Lost.

Euroclydon
Euróclydon. n.s. [ἐυροκλύδων.] A wind which blows between the East and North, and is very dangerous in the Mediterranean. It is of the nature of a whirlwind, which falls suddenly on ships, makes them tack about, and sometimes causes them to founder, as Pliny observes. Calmet.
There arose against it a tempestuous wind called euroclydon. Acts xxvii. 14.

European
Européan. n.s. [europæus, Latin.] Belonging to Europe.
Mean while the Spaniards in America,Near to the line the sun approaching saw,And hop'd their European coasts to findClear'd from our ships by the autumnal wind. Waller.
What was the waste of war, what fierce alarmsShook Asia's crown with European arms! Dryden's Æn.
                    He alone defy'dThe European thrones combin'd, and stillHad set at nought their machinations vain. Phillips.

Eurus
Eúrus. n.s. [Latin.] The East wind.
Eurus, as all other winds, must be drawn with blown cheeks, wings upon his shoulders, and his body the colour of the tawny moon. Peacham.

Eurythmy
Éurythmy. n.s. [ἐύρυθμος.] Harmony; regular and symmetrical measure.

Euthanasia
Euthanásia.Euthánasy.

n.s. [ἐυθανασία.] An easy death.


A recovery, in my case, and at my age, is impossible: the kindest wish of my friends is euthanasia. Arbuthnot.

Euthanasy
Euthanásia.Euthánasy.

n.s. [ἐυθανασία.] An easy death.


A recovery, in my case, and at my age, is impossible: the kindest wish of my friends is euthanasia. Arbuthnot.

Evangely
Evángely. n.s. [ἐυαγγέλιον, that is, good tidings.] Good tidings; the message of pardon and salvation; the holy gospel; the gospel of Jesus.
                     Good Lucius, That first received Christianity, The sacred pledge of Christ's evangely. Fairy Queen, b. ii.

Evanid
Evánid. adj. [evanidus, Latin.] Faint; weak; evanescent.
 Where there is heat and strength enough in the plant to make the leaves odorate, there the smell of the flower is rather evanid and weaker than that of the leaves. Bacon's Nat. Hist.
 The decoctions of simples, which bear the visible colours of bodies decocted, are dead and evanid, without the commixtion of allum, argol, and the like. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
 I put as great distance between our new lights and ancient truths, as between the sun and an evanid meteor. Glanv. Sceps.

Eventerate
To Evénterate. v.a. [eventero, Latin.] To rip up; to open by ripping the belly.
 In a bear, which the hunters eventerated, or opened, I beheld the young ones with all their parts distinct. Brown.

Eventilate
To Evéntilate. v.n. [eventilo, Latin.]

 To winnow; to sift out.

 To examine; to discuss. Dict.

Evergreen (noun)
Évergreen. n.s. A plant that retains its verdue through all the seasons.
Some of the hardiest evergreens may be transplanted, especially if the weather be moist and temperate. Evelyn's Kalend.
 I find you are against filling an English garden with evergreens. Addison's Spectator, №. 477.

Eviternal
Evitérnal. adj. [æviternus, Latin.] Eternal in a limited sense; of duration not infinitely but indefinitely long.

Eviternity
Evitérnity. n.s. [æviternitas, low Lat.] Duration not infinitely, but indefinitely long.

Evolution
Evolútion. n.s. [evolutus, Latin.]

 The act of unrolling or unfolding.

 The series of things unrolled or unfolded.
The whole evolution of ages, from everlasting to everlasting, is so collectedly and presentifickly represented to God at once, as if all things which ever were, are, or shall be, were at this very instant, and so always, really present and existent before him. More's Divine Dialogues.
 [In geometry.] The equable evolution of the periphery of a circle, or any other curve, is such a gradual approach of the circumference to rectitude, as that all its parts do meet together, and equally evolve or unbend; so that the same line becomes successively a less arch of a reciprocally greater circle, 'till at last they turn into a strait line. In the Philos. Transactions, № 260. you have a new quadratix to the circle, found by this means. Harris.

 [In tacticks.] The motion made by a body of men in changing their posture, or form of drawing up, either to make good the ground they are upon, or to possess themselves of another; that so they may attack the enemy, or receive his onset more advantageously.  And these evolutions are doubling of ranks or files, countermarches, and wheelings. Harris.
This spontaneous coagulation of the little saline bodies was preceded by almost innumerable evolutions, which were so various, that the little bodies came to obvert to each other those parts by which they might be best fasted together. Boyle.
 Evolution of Powers [in algebra]. Extracting of roots from any given power, being the reverse of involution. Harr.

Evomition
Evomítion. n.s. [evomo, Latin.] The act of vomiting out. Dict.

Evulgation
Evulgátion. n.s. [evulgo, Latin.] The act of divulging; publication. Dict.

Evulsion
Evúlsion. n.s. [evulsio, Latin.] The act of plucking out.
From a strict enquiry we cannot maintain the evulsion, or biting off any parts. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii. c. 2.

Ewe
Ewe. n.s. [eowe, Saxon.] The she-sheep; the female to the ram.
 Abraham set seven ewe lambs by themselves. Gen. xxi. 28.
 Rams have more wreathed horns than ewes. Bac. N. Hist.
                         Haste the sacrifice; Sev'n bullocks yet unyok'd, for Phœbus chuse; And for Diana seven unspotted ewes. Dryden's Æn. b. viii.

Ewer
Éwer. n.s. [from eau, perhaps anciently eu, water.] A vessel in which water is brought for washing hands.
 I dreamt of a silver bason and ewer to-night. Shakes. Timon.
 Let one attend him with a silver bason Full of rosewater, and bestrew'd with flowers; Another bear the ewer, a third a diaper; And say, wil't please your lordship cool your hands? Shak.
 The golden ewer a maid obsequious brings, Replenish'd from the cool, translucent springs; With copious water the bright vase supplies A silver laver, of capacious size: They wash. Pope's Odyssey, b. i. l. 179.

Ex
Ex. A Latin preposition often prefixed to compounded words; sometimes meaning out, as exhaust, to draw out; sometimes only enforcing the meaning, and sometimes producing little alteration.

Eximious
Exímious. adj. [eximius, Latin.] Famous; eminent; conspicuous; excellent. Dict.

Exinanition
Exinanítion. n.s. [exinanitio, Latin.] Privation; loss.
 He is not more impotent in his glory than he was in his exinanition. Decay of Piety.

Exist
To Exi'st. v.n. [existo, Latin.] To be; to have a being.
It is as easy to conceive that an infinite Almighty Power might produce a thing out of nothing, and make that to exist de novo, which did not exist before; as to conceive the world to have had no beginning, but to have existed from eternity. South's Sermons.
It seems reasonable to enquire, how such a multitude comes to make but one idea, since that combination does not always exist together in nature. Locke.
One year is past; a different scene! No farther mention of the dean: Who now, alas, no more is mist Than if he never did exist. Swift.

Existence
Exi'stence.Exi'stency.

n.s. [existentia, low Latin.] State of being; actual possession of being.


Nor is only the existency of this animal considerable, but many things delivered thereof. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii.
It is impossible any being can be eternal with successive eternal physical changes, or variety of states or manner of existency, naturally and necessarily concomitant unto it. Hale.
The soul, secur'd in her existence, smiles At the drawn dagger, and defies its point. Addison's Cato.
When a being is considered as possible, it is said to have an essence or nature; such were all things before the creation. When it is considered as actual, then it is said to have existence also. Watts's Logick.

Existency
Exi'stence.Exi'stency.

n.s. [existentia, low Latin.] State of being; actual possession of being.


Nor is only the existency of this animal considerable, but many things delivered thereof. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii.
It is impossible any being can be eternal with successive eternal physical changes, or variety of states or manner of existency, naturally and necessarily concomitant unto it. Hale.
The soul, secur'd in her existence, smiles At the drawn dagger, and defies its point. Addison's Cato.
When a being is considered as possible, it is said to have an essence or nature; such were all things before the creation. When it is considered as actual, then it is said to have existence also. Watts's Logick.

Existent
Exi'stent. adj. [from exist.] In being; in possession of being or of existence.
Whatsoever sign the sun possessed, whole recess or vicinity defineth the quarters of the year, those seasons were actually existent. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vi. c. 2.
The eyes and minds are fastened on objects which have no real being, as if they were truly existent. Dryden.

Existimation
Existimátion. n.s. [existimatio, Latin.]

 Opinion.

 Esteem.

Exit
Éxit. n.s. [exit, Latin.]

 The term set in the margin of plays to mark the time at which the player goes off the stage.

 Recess; departure; act of quitting the stage; act of quitting the theatre of life.
             All the world's a stage, And all the men and women meerly players:They have their exits and their entrances, And one man in his time plays many parts. Shakespeare.
 A regard for fame becomes a man more towards the exit than at his entrance into life. Swift.
 Many of your old comrades live a short life, and make a figure at their exit. Swift.
 Passage out of any place.
 In such a pervious substance as the brain, they might find an easy either entrance or exit, almost every where. Glanville.
 Way by which there is a passage out.
 The fire makes its way, forcing the water forth through its ordinary exits, wells, and the outlets of rivers. Woodw.

Exital
Exítal.Exítious.

adj. [exitialis, Latin.] Destructive; fatal; mortal.


 Most exitial fevers, although not concomitated with the tokens, exanthemata, anthraces, or carbuncles, are to be censured pestilential. Harvey on the Plague.

Exitious
Exítal.Exítious.

adj. [exitialis, Latin.] Destructive; fatal; mortal.


 Most exitial fevers, although not concomitated with the tokens, exanthemata, anthraces, or carbuncles, are to be censured pestilential. Harvey on the Plague.

Exodus
Éxodus.Éxody.

n.s. [ἕξοδος.] Departure; journey from a place: the second book of Moses is so called, because it describes the journey of the Israelites from Egypt.


 In all probability their years continued to be three hundred and sixty-five days, ever since the time of the Jewish exody at least. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Exody
Éxodus.Éxody.

n.s. [ἕξοδος.] Departure; journey from a place: the second book of Moses is so called, because it describes the journey of the Israelites from Egypt.


 In all probability their years continued to be three hundred and sixty-five days, ever since the time of the Jewish exody at least. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Exolete
Exoléte. adj. [exoletus, Lat.] Obsolete; out of use. Dict.

Exsuction
Exsúction. n.s. [exugo, Latin.] The act of sucking out, or draining out, without immediate contact of the power sucking with the thing sucked.
 If you open the valve, and force up the sucker, after this first exsuction you will drive out almost a whole cylinder full of air. Boyle.

Exsuffolate
To Exsúffolate. v.a. [a word peculiar to Shakespeare.] To whisper; to buzz in the ear, [from the Italian verb suffolar.
                 Exchange me for a goat, When I shall turn the business of my soul To such exsuffolate and blown surmises. Shakesp. Othello.

Extemporal
Extémporal. adj. [extemporalis, Latin.]

 Uttered without premeditation; quick; ready; sudden.
 Alcidimus the sophister hath many arguments to prove, that voluntary and extemporal far excelleth premeditated speech. Hooker, b. v. s. 22.
 A man of pleasant and popular conversation, of good extemporal judgment and discourse, for the satisfying of publick ministers. Wotton's Life of the Duke of Buckingham.
 Speaking without premeditation.
 Many foolish things fall from wise men, if they speak in haste, or be extemporal. Ben. Johnson's Discoveries.

Exulcerate
Exu'lcerate. v.a. [exulcere, Latin.]

 To make sore with an ulcer; to affect with a running or eating sore.
Cantharides, applied to any part of the body, touch the bladder and exulcerate, if they stay on long . Bac. Nat. Hist.
That the saliva hath a virtue of macerating bodies, appears by the effects in taking away warts, sometimes exulcerating the jaws, and rotting the teeth. Ray on the Creation.
The stagnating serum turning acrimonious, exulcerates and putrifies the bowels, producing most dismal symptoms.  Arbuthnot on Diet.
 To afflict; to corrode; to enrage.
Thoughts, my tormentors, arm'd with deadly stings, Mangle my apprehensive tenderest parts, Exasperate, exulcerate, and raise Dire inflammation, which no cooling herb Or medicinal liquor can asswage. Milton's Agonistes, l. 623.

Exulceration
Exulcera'tion. n.s. [from exulcerate.]

 The beginning erosion, which wears away the substance and forms an ulcer. Quincy.

 Exacerbation; corrosion.
This exulceration of mind made him apt to take all occasions of contradiction. Hooker, b. ii. s. 5.

Exulceratory
Exu'lceratory. adj. [from exulcerate] Having a tendency to cause ulcers.

Exult
To Exu'lt. v.n. [exulto, Latin.] To rejoice above measure; to triumph; to be in high exaltation of gladness.
The whole world did seem to exult that it had occasion of pouring out gifts to so blessed a purpose. Hooker, b. v. s. 13.
                         Who might be your mother, That you insult, exult, and rail, at once Over the wretched. Shakespeare's As you like it.

Exultance
Exu'ltance. n.s. [from exult.] Transport; joy; triumph; gladness; exultation.
We have great cause of exultance and joy, God's service being the most perfect freedom. Government of the Tongue.

Exultation
Exulta'tion. n.s. [exultatio, Latin.] Joy; triumph; rapturous delight.
Good effects may grow in each of the people towards other, in them all towards their pastor, and in their pastor towards every of them; between whom there daily and interchangeably pass, in the hearing of God himself, and in the presence of his holy angels, so many heavenly acclamations, exultations, provocations, petitions. Hooker, b. v. s. 39.
Devotion inspires men with sentiments of religious gratitude, and swells their hearts with inward transports of joy and exultation. Addison's Freeholder, № 49.

Exundate
To Exúndate. v.n. [exundo, Lat.] To overflow. Dict.

Exundation
Exunda'tion. n.s. [from exundate.] Overflow; abundance.
 It is more worthy of the Diety to attribute the creation of the world to the exundation and overflowing of his transcendent and infinite goodness. Ray on Creation.

Exuperable
Exu'perable. adv. [exuperabilis, Latin.] Conquerable, superable, vincible.

Exuperance
Exúperance. n.s. [exuperantia, Lat.] Overbalance; greater proportion.
 Rome hath less variation than London; for on the West side of Rome are seated France, Spain and Germany, which take off the exuperance, and balance the vigour of the Eastern parts. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 2.

Exuscitate
To Exúscitate. v.a. [exsuscito, Latin.] To stir up; to rouse.

Exustion
Exústion. n.s. [exustio, Latin.] The act of burning up; consumption by fire.

Exuviae
Exu'viæ. n.s. [Latin.] Cast skins; cast shells; whatever is thrown off, or shed by animals.
The fishes upon this stone have taken up so little room in the stone, that they appear to be only the skins of exuviæ, rather than entire bodes of fishes.  Woodward on Fishes.

Ey
Ey.Ea.Ee.

 May either come from ıᵹ, an island, by melting the Saxon ᵹ into ẏ, which is usually done; or from the Saxon a, which signifies a water, river, &c. or, lastly, from ıaᵹ, a field, by the same kind of melting. Gibson.

Eyas
Eýas. n.s. [niais, French.] A young hawk just taken from the nest, not able to prey for itself. Hanmer.
 There is, sir, an aiery of children, little eyases, that cry out. Shakespeare's Hamlet.

Eyasmusket
Ey'asmusket. n.s. A young unfledged male hawk of the musket kind. Hanmer.
Here comes little Robin. —How now, my eyasmusket; what news with you? Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.

Eye (noun)
Eye. n.s. obsolete plural eyne, now eyes. [auga, Gothick; aᵹ, Saxon; oog, Dutch; ee, Scottish, plur. eene.]

 The organ of vision; the medium of the sense of sight.
Good sir John, as you have one eye upon my follies, turn another into the register of your own, that I may pass with a reproof off the easier. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
My face is but a moon, and clouded too.— Blessed are clouds to do as such clouds do:Vouchsafe, bright moon, and these thy stars to shine,Those clouds remov'd, upon our watry eyne. Shakespeare.
                  Nor doth the eye itself,That most pure spirit of sense, behold itself,Not going from itself; but eyes oppos'd,Salute each other with each other's form. Sh. Troil. and Cress.
He kept him as the apple of his eye. Deutr. xxxii. 10.
As long looking against the sun or fire hurteth the eye by dilatation; so curious printing in small volumes, and reading of small letters, do hurt the eye by contraction. Bacon.
His awful presence did the crowd surprize,Nor durst the rash spectator meet his eyes;Eyes that confess'd him born for kingly sway,So fierce, they flash'd intolerable day. Dryd. Knight's Tale.
But sure the eye of time beholds no nameSo blest as thine in all the rolls of fame. Pope's Odyssey.
 Sight; ocular knowledge.
Who hath bewitched you, that you should not obey the truth, before whose eyes Jesus Christ hath been evidently set forth? Gal. iii. 1.
 Look; countenance.
I'll say yon grey is not the morning's eye,'Tis but the pale reflex of Cynthia's brow. Sh. Rom. and Jul.
 Front; face.
    To justify this worthy nobleman,Her shall you hear disproved to your eyes. Shakespeare's Measure for Measure.
 A posture of direct opposition, where one thing is in the same line with another.
Now pass'd, on either side they nimbly tack,Both strive to intercept and guide the wind;And in its eye more closely they come back,To finish all the deaths they left behind. Dryd. Ann. Mirab.
 Aspect; regard.
Having an eye to a number of rites and orders in the church of England, as marrying with a ring, &c. sundry church-offices, dignities and callings, for which they found no commandment in the holy Scripture, they thought by the one only stroke of an axiom to have cut them off. Hooker, b. iii. s. 4.
As in Scripture a number of laws, particular and positive, being in force, may not by any law of man be violated; we are, in making laws, to have thereunto an especial eye. Hooker.
The man that is tender among you, and very delicate, his eyes shall be evil towards his brother. Deutr. xxviii. 54.
He that hath a bountiful eye shall be blessed. Prov. xxii. 9.
None should be put into either of those commissions, with an eye of favour to their persons, to give them countenance or reputation in the places where they live. Bacon to Villiers.
Winds and hurricanes at land, tempests and storms at sea, have always been looked upon as evil an eye as earthquakes. Woodward's Natural History.
In this disposal of my sister, I have had an eye to her being a wit, and provided that the bridegroom be a man of sound judgment. Tatler, № 75.
Booksellers mention with respect the authors they have printed, and consequently have an eye to their own advantage. Addison's Spectator, № 92.
 Notice; attention; observation.
Not satisfied with our oath, he appointed a band of horsemen to have an eye that we should not go beyond appointed limits. Sidney, b. ii.
Lawmakers must have an eye to the place where, and to the men amongst whom. Hooker, b. i. s. 10.
His majesty hath cast his eyes upon you, as finding you to be such as you should be, or hoping to make you to be such as he would have you to be. Bacon.
If the English had driven the Irish into the plains and open countries, where they might have an eye and observation upon them, the Irish had been easily kept in order. Davies on Irel.
Spenser has followed both Virgil and Theocritus in the charms which he employs for curing Britomartis of her love; but he had also our poet's Ceiris in his eye. Dryden's Æn.
Misdoubt my constancy, and do not try;But stay and ever keep me in your eye. Dryd. Ind. Emperor.
After this jealousy he kept a strict eye upon him. L'Estrange.
This method of teaching children by a repeated practice, under the eye and direction of the tutor, 'till they have got the habit of doing well, has many advantages. Locke.
These are intrinsick difficulties arising from the text itself, as the uncertainty sometimes who are the persons he speaks to, or the opinions or practices which he has in his eye. Locke.
Several performances have been justly applauded for their wit, which have been written with an eye to this predominant humour of the town. Addison's Freeholder, № 35.
We were the most obedient creatures in the world, constant to our duty, and kept a steddy eye on the end for which we were sent hither. Spectator, № 577.
 Opinion formed by observation.
She told her husband, she designed to be beautiful in no body's eye but his. Sidney.
It hath, in their eye, no great affinity with the form of the church of Rome. Hooker, b. v. s. 27.
Like one of two contending in a prize,That thinks he hath done well in people's eyes. Shakespeare.
I was as far from meditating a war as I was, in the eye of the world, from having any preparations for one. K. Charles.
Though he in all the people's eyes seem'd great,Yet greater he appear'd in his retreat. Denham.
 Sight; view; the place in which any thing may be seen.
There shall he practise tilts and tournaments,Hear sweet discourse, converse with noblemen;And be, in eye of every exercise,Worthy his youth and nobleness of birth. Shakespeare.
 Any thing formed like an eye.
Or see colours like the eye of a peacock's feather, by pressing our eyes on either corner, whilst we look the other way. Newton's Opt.
 Any small perforation.
This Ajax has not so much wit as will stop the eye of Helen's needle. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.
Does not our Saviour himself speak of the intolerable difficulty which they cause in men's passage to heaven? Do not they make the narrow way much narrower, and contract the gate, which leads to life to the streightness of a needle's eye? South's Sermons.
 A small catch into which a hook goes.
Those parts, if they cohere to one another but by rest only, may be much more easily dissociated, and put into motion by any external body, than they could be, if they were by little hooks and eyes, or other kind of fastenings entangled in one another. Boyle.
 Bud of a plant.
Prune and cut off all your vine-shoots to the very root, save one or two of the stoutest, to be left with three or four eyes of young wood. Evelyn's Kalendar.
 A small shade of colour.
The ground indeed is tawny.— With an eye of green in't. Shakesp. Tempest.
Red with an eye of blue, makes a purple. Boyle on Colours.
 Power of perception.
The eyes of your understanding being enlightened. Eph. i.
A gift doth blind the eyes of the wife. Deutr. xvi. 19.

Eye (verb active)
To Eye.. v.a. [from the noun.] To watch; to keep in view; to observe.
When they are laid in garrison, they may better hide their defaults than when they are in camp, where they are continually eyed and noted of all men. Spenser on Ireland.
                 Full many a lady I've  ey'd with best regard. Shakespeare's Tempest.
                 The kitchen Malkin pins Her richest lockram 'bout her reeky neck, Clamb'ring the walls to eye him. Shakes. Coriolanus.
Bid the cheek be ready with a blush, Modest as morning, when she coldly eyes The youthful Phœbus. Shakes. Troilus and Cressida.
Bold deed thou hast presum'd, advent'rous Eve, And peril great provok'd, who thus hath dar'd, Had it been only coveting to eye That sacred fruit. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ix. l. 923.
Such a story as the basilisk is that of the wolf, concerning priority of vision, that a man becomes hoarse and dumb, if the wolf have the advantage first to eye him. Brown's Vulg. Err.
It was needful for her perpetually to eye her pursuing enemy. More's Antidote against Atheism.
Then gave it to his faithful squire, With lessons how t' observe and eye her. Hudibras, p. iii.
Eye nature's walks, shoot folly as it flies, And catch the manners living as they rise. Pope's Ess. on Man.
             Have a box when eunuchs sing, And foremost in the circle eye a king. Pope's Epist. of Hor.

Eye (verb neuter)
To Eye. v.n. To appear; to show; to bear an appearance.
                         Forgive me, Since my becomings kill me when they do not Eye well to you. Shakes. Anthony and Cleopatra.

Eyeball
Ey'eball. n.s. [eye and ball.] The apple of the eye; the pupil.
Oh, were mine eyeballs into bullets turn'd, That I in rage might shoot them at your faces! Shak. H. VI.
Be subject to no sight but mine: invisible To every eyeball else. Shakespeare's Tempest.
I feel my hair grow stiff, my eyeballs rowl; This is the only form could shake my soul. Dryd. Ind. Emp.
Not when a gilt buffet's reflected pride Turns you from sound philosophy aside, Not when from plate to plate your eyeballs roll, And the brain dances to the mantling bowl. Pope's Horace.

Eyebright
Eyebri'ght. n.s. [euphrasia, Latin.] It hath an anomalous personated flower of one leaf, divided into two lips; the upper one upright, parted into several divisions; and the lower one divided into three parts, each of which is again divided into two: out of the flowercup rises the pointal, which afterwards turns to a fruit, or oblong husk, divided into two parts, and replete with small feeds. Miller.

Eyebrow
Ey'ebrow. n.s. [eye and brow.] The hairy arch over the eye.
                                 The lover, Sighing like a furnace, with a woful ballad Made to his mistress eyebrow. Shakesp. As you like it.
On the seventh day he shall shave all his hair off his head, his beard, and his eyebrows. Lev. xiv. 9.
Above stand the eyebrows, to keep any thing from running down upon them; as drops of sweat from the forehead,. or dust. Ray on the Creation.
The balls of his broad eyes roll'd in his head, And glar'd betwixt a yellow and a red; He look'd a lion with a gloomy stare, And o'er his eyebrows hung his matted hair. Dryden.

Eyedrop
Ey'edrop. n.s. [eye and drop.] Tear.
 That tyranny which never quaft but blood, Would by beholding him have wash'd his knife With gentle eyedrops. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.

Eyeglance
Ey'eglance. n.s. [eye and glance.] Quick notice of the eye.
 His countenance was bold, and bashed not For Guyon's looks; but scornful eyeglance at him shot. F. Q.

Eyeglass
Ey'eglass. n.s. [eye and glass.] Spectacles; glass to assist the sight.
                 Ha' not you seen, Camillo? But that's past doubt you have; or your eyeglass Is thicker than a cuckold's horn. Shakes. Winter's Tale.
By comparing it with a good perspective of four foot in length, made with a concave eyeglass, I could read at a greater distance with my own instrument than with the glass. Newton.

Eyeless
Ey'eless. adj. [from eye.] Without eyes; sightless; deprived of sight.
             A proclaim'd prize! most happy! That eyeless head of thine was first fram'd flesh To raise my fortunes. Shakesp. King Lear.
                         Promise was, that I Should Israel from Philistian yoke deliver: Ask for this great deliverer now, and find him Eyeless in Gaza, at the mill with slaves: Himself is bound under Philistian yoke. Milton's Agonistes.
                     Pentheus durst deride The cheated people, and the eyeless guide. Addison's Ovid's Metamorph.
Eyeless he grop'd about with vengeful haste, And justled promontories as he pass'd. Garth's Ovid.
                     Meonides, Poor eyeless pilgrim. Phillips.
         Cyclop, if any pitying thy disgrace, Ask who disfigur'd thus that eyeless face. Pope's Odyssey.

Eyelet
Eýelet. n.s. [œillet, French, a little eye.] A hole through which light may enter; any small perforation for a lace to go through.
Slitting the back and fingers of a glove, I made eyelet holes to draw it close. Wiseman's Surgery.

Eyelid
Ey'elid. n.s. [eye and lid.] The  membrane that shuts over the eye.
Therewith her dim eyelids she up 'gan rear, On which the dreary death did sit, as sad As lump of lead, and made dark clouds appear. Fai. Queen.
Mark when she smiles with amiable chear, And tell me whereto can ye liken it! When on each eyelid sweetly do appear An hundred graces as in shade to sit. Spenser's Sonnets.
On my eyelids is the shadow of death. Job xvi. 16.
Fetch me that flower; the herb I shew'd thee once; The juice of it, on sleeping eyelids laid, Will make or man or woman madly doat Upon the next live creature that it sees. Shakespeare.
The Turks have a black powder, made of a mineral called alcohol, which with a fine long black pencil they lay under their eyelids, which doth colour black, whereby the white of the eye is set off more white. Bacon's Natural History.
At length, the crackling noise and dreadful blaze Call'd up some waking lover to the sight; And long it was ere he the rest could raise, Whose heavy eyelids yet were full of night. Dryden.

Eyeservant
Eyesérvant. n.s. [eye and servant.] A servant that works only while watched.

Eyeservice
Eyese'rvice. n.s. [eye and service.] Service performed only under inspection.
Servants, obey in all things your master; not with eyeservice, as men pleasers, but in singleness of heart. Col. iii.

Eyeshot
Ey'eshot. n.s. [eye and shot.] Sight; glance; view.
I must carry off my prize as others do; and not think of sharing the booty before I am free from danger, and out of eyeshot from the other windows. Dryden's Don Sebastian.
I have preserved many a young man from her eyeshot by this means. Spectator, №. 284.

Eyesight
Ey'esight. n.s. [eye and sight.] Sight of the eye.
The Lord hath recompensed me according to my cleanness in his eyesight. 2 Sam. xxii. 22.
                 I have an ill-divining soul: Methinks I see thee, now thou art below, As one dead in the bottom of a tomb; Either my eyesight fails, or thou look'st pale. Shakespeare.
                         I love  you, sir, Dearer than eyesight, space and liberty, Beyond what can be valued, rich or rare. Shakes. K. Lear.
                     Though sight be lost, Life yet hath many solaces, enjoy'd Where other senses want not their delights, At home in leisure and domestick ease, Exempt from many a care and chance, to which Eyesight exposes daily men abroad. Milton's Agonistes.
Josephus sets this down from his own eyesight, being himself a chief captain at the siege of Jopata, where these events happened. Wilkin's Math. Magic.
He blinds the wise, gives eyesight to the blind, And molds and stamps anew the lover's mind. Dryden.

Eyesore
Ey'esore. n.s. [eye and sore.] Something offensive to the sight.
Hath the church of Christ, from the first beginning, by a secret universal instinct of God's good spirit, always tied itself to end neither sermon, nor almost any speech of moment, which hath concerned matters of God, without some special words of honour and glory to the Trinity which we all adore; and is the like conclusion of psalms become now, at length, an eyesore, or a galling to the ears that hear it? Hooker, b. v.
Fy, doff this habit; shame to your estate, And eyesore to our solemn festival. Shak. Tam. of the Shrew.
As soon as the two lords came thither they covered, to the trouble of the other; but having presently to speak, they were quickly freed from that eyesore. Clarendon, b. viii.
Mordecai was an eyesore to Haman. L'Estrange, Fable 38.
He's the best piece of man's flesh in the market; not an eyesore in his whole body. Dryden's Don Sebastian.

Eyespotted
Eyespo'tted. adj. [eye and spot.] Marked with spots like eyes.
Nor Juno's bird, in her eyespotted train, So many goodly colours doth contain. Spenser.

Eyestring
Eyestríng. n.s. [eye and string.] The string of the eye; the tendon by which the eye is moved.
I would have broke mine eyestrings; crackt them, butTo look upon him. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
To know whether the sheep are sound or not, see that their gums be red, the brisket-skin red, and the eyestrings ruddy. Mortimer's Husbandry.

Eyetooth
Eýetooth. n.s. [eye and tooth.] The tooth on the upper jaw next on each side to the grinders; the fang.
The next one on each side stronger and deeper rooted, and more pointed, called canini, in English eyeteeth, to tear the more tough sort of aliments. Ray on the Creation.

Eyewink
Eýewink. n.s. [eye and wink.] A wink, as a hint or token.
They would have won any woman's heart; and, I warrant you, they could never get an eyewink of her. Shakespeare.

Eyewitness
Eyewítness. n.s. [eye and witness.] An ocular evidence; one who gives testimony to facts seen with his own eyes.
We made known unto you the power and coming of our Lord Jesus Christ, and were eyewitnesses of his majesty 2. Pet.
To meet him all his saints, who silent stoodEyewitnesses of his mighty acts,With jubilee advanc'd. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vi.
          Give us, if thou can'st,Eyewitness of what first or last was done,Relation more particular and distinct. Milton's Agonistes.
The curious, by laying together circumstances, attestations, and characters of those who are concerned in them, either receive or reject what at first but eyewitnesses could absolutely believe or disbelieve. Addison on the Christian Religion.

Eyre
Eyre. n.s. [eyre, French; iter, Latin.] The court of justices itinerants; and justices in eyre are those only, which Bracton in many places calls justiciarios itinerantes. The eyre also of the forest is nothing but the justice-seat, otherwise called; which is, or should by ancient custom, be held every three years by the justices of the forest, journeying up and down to that purpose. Cowel.

Eyry
Eýry. n.s. [from ey, an egg.] The place where birds of prey build their nests and hatch.
                      But I was born so high,Our eyrie buildeth in the cedars top,And dallies with the wind, and scorns the sun. Shak. R. III.
                    The eagle, and the stork,On cliffs and cedar-tops their eyries build. Milt. Par. Lost.
Some haggard hawk, who had her eyry nigh,Well pounc'd to fasten, and well wing'd to fly. Dryden.
